The best thing that could happen to any brand or person promoting services on Tumblr is for their post to go "Viral", this occurs when users start reblogging the content thousands of time.
Meanwhile feast your eyes on beautiful Suzanne!
- Greg Deuhs, Redhook brewmaster
Cline made her network television debut on January 7, 1956 on ABC-TV‘s Grand Ole Opry;[4] followed by an appearance on the network’s Ozark Jubilee later that month,[5] returning to the show in April. Later that year, while looking for material for her first album, Patsy Cline, a song appeared titled “Walkin’ After Midnight“, written by Don Hecht and Alan Block. Cline initially did not like the song because it was, according to her, “just a little old pop song.” However, the song’s writers and record label insisted she should record it.
Fighting For Redemption is an underground, self-published, anti-hero story…spun with direct and obvious influences of Japanese cartoons, video-games, and Hong Kong cinema. It is written with a brutal honesty about the main character/writer, and the other characters I encounter along the way. It’s based off a true story…but it’s DEFINITELY NOT meant for everyone.
Yesterday I began my day at Westside Lexus. You want to learn how to make your customers happy? Take a lesson from the service department.
First one is Caspar ..he´s in my favorite halloween theme colour black ond orange.
Today’s post is dedicated to you, if you believe in a Higher Power, no matter what faith you belong to.
This is one of the other portraits in the 6th. It's pretty good, too. At least nobody's pissed at this guy --
As we approached the tower, we both noticed something that neither of us had before. There are names running all the way around the lowest level. We walked to each side and came to the (correct) conclusion that they must all be scientists and mathematicians. We did not recognize most of the names, but all of the ones we did recognize ( e.g. Fourier, Le Chatelier, Daguerre, Lagrange, Laplace, Ampere, Carnot, Legendre, Becquerel, Cauchy, Fresnel, Coulomb, Foucault, Lavoisier, Poisson, Wurtz, Clapeyron) fell into that category. ”Dumas” threw us off when we reached the Northeast side of the tower – but looking it up later, we discovered it was a different Dumas then the one that originally came to mind.
-Spelltower: So, I really dislike the iOS. It’s somewhat irrational, mostly it has to do with Apple being just this side of madly cackling with every product release. They just definitely seem up to something and it makes me uncomfortable to give them money. And the nice bit has been that until recently it didn’t matter. The iPad is either a shitty computer or a giant version of your phone. This game though, so fun. It’s like Scrabble but good. You have, in the “real” Puzzle game mode, a few lines of random letters on the bottom. You need to make words in order to get the tiles to disappear. Every time you make one, the tiles rise another level. So like scrabble crossed with Tetris but more fun than that sounds.
He don’t say and I can’t tell.
little House Mouse image)
But it was not just fascinating facts that Sue Armstrong extracted in these interviews, but moral and political aspects of their work too. Derrick Pounder and Sue Black, for instance, described how they coped with dealing with the aftermath of Sarajevo and Kosovo; while there were equally moving revelations from Helen Wainwright and Patricia Klepp about working in South Africa. The interviewer also encouraged the doctors to talk about how they dealt with issues such as race - for instance Kumarasen Cooper described finding himself as the first professor 'of colour' leading a team of white consultants. Another issue frequently addressed is motherhood, andin this context Waney Squier's interview is particularly impressive, since she described with great honesty her part in the 'shaken baby' diagnosis, and the effect of a wrong diagnosis on the family concerned and the doctor herself.
As usual I had my Naturist uniform with me and so could take full advantage of this beautiful day. Walking along the shoreline I reached the designated area, took a few more steps and then my T-shirt and shorts came off and I joined the 2 dozen or more local naturist who were also enjoying the sun.
3.) Copy and paste the blog award on your blog.
I don't usually post on Mondays but I wanted to let you know about a new endeavor, The Bucks County Writer's Group blog. We've decided to get our collective writing experience out there, especially what we've learned from being in a writing group. The blog will be less personal journey, more how-to. I'm sure I'll get lots of venting and snark in my posts, regardless. Check us out - we post on Mondays.
My kids and I have been having fun making some of these adorable things this week. We are using the cute pencil toppers for our valentines for friends. Plus, we have made the little candy boxes- they are adorable!
While the boil was going, I was able to rack my second Red #4 to make room in a primary. I always siphon a taste off. Dave said that it was very hoppy. I enjoyed it because the Saaz hops are exactly the flavor I'm going for. The Red gets dry hopped with Saaz Auscha hops for a couple/three weeks. I may rack again to try to filter off the hops and then finally to keg.
But children grow up, as I've learned to my sorrow.
On an entirely normal, beautiful fall day in Chester's Mill, Maine, the town is inexplicably and suddenly sealed off from the rest of the world by an invisible force field. Planes crash into it and fall from the sky in flaming wreckage, a gardener's hand is severed as "the dome" comes down on it, people running errands in the neighboring town are divided from their families, and cars explode on impact. No one can fathom what this barrier is, where it came from, and when -- or if -- it will go away.
I am now the Duke of temporary relationships, I fall in love with people that were never with me to begin with. With people that were drifting away on a completely different orbit than mine, their lives revolving around a different star than mine. Their sun does not rise and set with mine. The directions are skewed. From my perspective, they live their lives in gymbal lock, gyrating wildly without any bearings or hope of landfall. Their zodiacs are out of whack, they irritate me. They are not for me.
5. Drain the raisins and reserve the bourbon. Place a Dutch oven or heavy pot over medium-high heat. Add enough olive oil to lightly coat the bottom. Once hot, add the pork shoulder, shallots, garlic and 3 sprigs of thyme. Sear the pork shoulder on all sides. Watch the shallots and garlic and remove if they appear to burn. Once the pork is browned, remove and set aside. Add the reserved bourbon to deglaze. WARNING: Be careful, the bourbon may ignite. This is not a bad thing, just be careful. Once the bourbon is nearly evaporated, add the beer, stock, and any removed garlic, or shallots. Bring to a boil and let simmer for 15 min. Strain the liquid, and skim off any obvious extra fat. You are making a flavorful stock to use later. Set it aside.
I can’t believe I’m saying this, but…I like my job—the work, the people, the company. I like all of it.
She replied by saying she would have him call. He never called that evening or the next day.
being so close to the Holidays, like many of you my scrappy splurges are put on hold for now, lol.
101) I hate to cook. Love to eat, hate to cook. I mean, I can do it and all, and fancy stuff, too, it's just that I consider it a pain in the arse. I'd much rather go out to a restaurant.
The important thing to take away from all of this is that individual state migration patterns can be considered an indicator of a state’s economic health. In 2011, Wisconsin was considered an outbound state where more shipments were moving out of the state. Over the last 10 years, Wisconsin has been a balanced state for six years (2003, 2005-6, and 2008-10) and an outbound state for four years (2002, 2004, 2007, and 2011). In all of those years, outbound shipments were greater than inbound shipment except for 2006 when shipment were equal.
dress — Express (Marshalls, I think? It's older than dirt)
ITS SIGNIFICANCE: The “GOTCHA” headline is noteworthy for its pro-war point of view. The use of the first person (“our lads”) in the drophead makes it clear that the Sun was not a detached observer of the conflict, but a direct participant.
1/2 tsp. oregano
He will always be remembered as one of the greatest.
1-1/2 cups all-purpose flour
Should US and NATO authorities decide to say they are sorry to all those affected over the weekend, it might prove to be a busy few days for western forces. The Afghan government reports that at least four airstrikes shook the country in the last few days.
A third vehicle crashed into the accident. Three other people were injured.
I left my husband in 1994, but we are still close and we love each other very much. In 1996, three days after my lovely mum died, I qualified as a Homeopath, picked up my babies, a bag of clothes, three bikes, a mattress and a copy of Pippi longstocking and drove to Horningsham in Wiltshire where I rented a little cottage in the middle of a field. Here, I wept for my mum and my dad and our sad life and slowly and gently nursed myself back to some vague sense of normality.
Привет девочки...
Please keep in mind that these polls are being conducted completely in the spirit of fun. I realize most voters haven't had a chance to watch ALL the nominees, but consider this event an opportunity to learn about the diverse offerings from 2011, and to perhaps stumble upon a movie or series you didn't even know existed. Links for all titles are available at my Upcoming Vampire Movies & Series page.
So, without further ado...
On a more serious note, some of the members of our team have had some sad as well as tragic news this past week. I won't divulge theirs, but a friend of mine has a 12 year old that was diagnosed with stage 4 cancer last Friday and was only given 2 weeks, as it has already spread quickly. Apparently his ADHD medicine masked most of the important symptoms. Please pray for Brendan Franco, and for his family. And also a prayer for the families of our DT members.
My amazing aunt (who helped paint these stripes with an eyeliner brush, and was vital to the assembly of this room), came to my rescue again when it came time to decorating the bathroom. ("Here or here? Oh, how about this here! Cuuuuuute") I went through a cross-collecting phase a few years ago, so in addition to the mirrors and trinkets from our trips, we had plenty to choose from. Instead of just one or two objects on the wall, we opted for big impact by hanging 21! I think we captured the Mexican culture we're so smitten by!
If we start with a sense of well-being and inherent self-worth, then the doing, achieving, and acquiring emerges from our authentic core, not from a sense of lack. The doing, achieving, and acquiring comes from a congruent matching of internal desires with what you want to manifest in the world. This unconditional positive regard is not a prescription for resignation or rationalization. It is an invitation for an open-hearted acceptance and honest inventory of who we are now and who we want to become. Personal growth is a given of the human journey.
I can tell you that I may be moving dots and spots..........again, to slightly bigger premises!
This time, however, I thought I could try and change the process. Ho-ho-ho.
From ”Economic and Philosophical Manuscripts of 1844″.
Diti, the wife of Kas’yapa, is feeling romantic — okay, horny — and she approaches her husband one evening while he is at his meditation. All his other wives have children, she says to him. Can’t he give her children, too? Right now?
Well folks, we’re onto another of our garam masalas! I hope you’ve enjoyed making some (or all, or none!) of these masalas. This week, as I said in my vegan blog last week, is my poultry masala. Well, as so much of my food is woven into my life here’s another little tale.
I’m not really sure I know what to do about it.
As we grew up, our lives paralleled in many ways. The major one was that we both rededicated our lives to the Lord in 1998. At a time where none of my other friends understood the new rebirth and the passionate love for Jesus that you feel as a new Born Again Christian, Abigail understood. We shared that with each other along with marriage and children.
However, because I was going to have to wait in line to buy the sheet, it pushed me over the edge on another possibility, two metres of textured, seafoam, probably-polyester coating.
He wanted me to meet him off post, and to pick up the kids. He was gonna continue over to the West side to get his new tires put on his Suburban. They were in, and there was JUSt enough time between now and 5:30pm.
Steak with Rosemary and Mint
Somewhere, beneath the twisted wreckage that is currently team morale at Burridge AFC, is a desire to do well for the football club. At present that desire is only able to express itself as it did during the second-half on Saturday afternoon – all too often by bickering with one another. Sadly, this new trait spilled over into the post-match chores of taking down the goal nets, and continued in the changing rooms. This behaviour doesn't reflect well on either the club or the players. Quite frankly, it's a bit of a mess.
As you know when it is a new month,
Granted, I work from home while he's out "busting his butt," so the least I can do is his laundry, right? Well, I don't mind doing it - really I don't. Laundry is a small task in my eyes. After all, I don't literally wash anything - the washing machine does.
68 4. “Freedom of Speech and the First Amendment.” University of Detroit Law Journal, vol. 42, pp. 55-73 (October 1964). (Source: Item D-II/21/1964, below.) Corrections are needed.
Submaximal loads and strength development
*Our mortgage lady contacted us a couple of weeks ago to see if we might want to refinance the house. The interest rates have gone down significantly and she thought it might save us some money. Uh--YAH! Try $118,000.00. Yep, we ended up refinancing at 4.25% (instead of 6%) and were able to go down to a 15 yr mortgage instead of a 30 year, so now our payments went up by only about $60 but our house will be paid off when I'm 46 (or sooner, by the grace of God!)!! How exciting is that!?! Overall for the life of the loan, we will have saved 118 grand by paying it off in 15 yr instead of 30 yr!! **extra bonus...by doing this re-fi we got to find out what our credit score is. I've never known what our score was...but always wondered. I know we try to do our best with our finances. When she told us that our score was 832 on a scale of 300-850, we were elated! ALLLLL the glory goes to GOD because it is HIM who has provided the money for all of our needs/wants/bills all these years and enabled us to be so blessed! Tithing and giving is such a blessing!
Round 3 of "Which Sucks Less" this week: DS Lite vs. DSi. I had a continued annual of absorbing capacity for this week's episode… which is still sitting on my computer lath beyond I larboard it that morning, so I appealing abundant abutting in whatever capacity came up.
citizens. It should scale
This is the meal I made for my fellow Marine Corps wife who recently lost her husband. I got a text message from her about an hour after I dropped it off saying “You can cook for me anytime! That was SO good!”. This is also the meal I make for new moms for 2 reasons. One, it is very healthy and losing that baby weight is on the back (or front) of all new mom’s minds. And two, it is very breastfeeding friendly. There are no gas producing veggies like broccoli or acidic foods like tomato sauces which are in all Italian casseroles. The only change I make for nursing moms is to use onion powder instead of real onions (just in case they give the baby gas, like they do both of my babies while nursing).
You take that water in the bottle
Anyway, I just wanted to share this shirt cause I’m being obsessive.
5. Missing my husband while he is away...even though it's a short trip to speak in Jacksonville, just wish he was home tonight.
“It’s about 7.05 a.m.”
Don't forget you need to have left a comment on each Blog in the Hop, including Cupcake and mine for a chance to win the Candy from Funky Farm Scrapbook Barn!! A winner will be chosen randomly and announced in the post on 9 May.
We were lucky enough to be in Tokyo on a Sunday when there are a farmer's markets throughout the city. As the Japanese are with everything, the packaging the vegetables was impeccable. Every vegetable and piece of fruit had a place and was wrapped perfectly. Everything the Japanese do is a work of art.
The BNP will be running a campaign to get a public inquiry started to investigate these crimes.
week’s article, is a function of
ACFN asserts their treaty rights were violated by the provincial government through current policies of granting of tar sands leases and in particular to leases granted to Shell Canada Ltd. The leases in question are in an area of important cultural value allowing the continued hunting, fishing and gathering practices of the community. ACFN are signatories to Treaty 8, a constitutionally protected agreement, which asserts the right to hunt, fish and trap on their traditional lands. The federal government has a duty to consult with First Nations regarding any development on their lands before breaking ground.
She however has an exquisite trust in her own intelligence – she knows that she's more clever than her attackers. "They expect you to react in a certain way and when you react differently, it confuses them. Then they don't know what to do. We will always beat them in the end,' she concluded.
I cant really complain....that camera has been working perfectly for 7 years. Nothing lasts forever. If I cant get it fixed, I will have to get a new camera. In the meantime, I havent gone anywhere. I am still here, waiting for Christmas and still crocheting some last minute gifts. I want to wish every one of you who visits my blog (and who celebrates Christmas) a very happy and safe holiday and a very prosperous New Year. I will post again soon!
The woman was woken abruptly by someone who had picked her up and lifted her out of her bed. Her eyes opened to three unknown men who had entered her house.
"What do you want to be when you grow up?" Miss Anderson asked the first little boy.
Hugs and kisses to all.
“The abuse seems to be increasingly rapidly, and the internet offers an additional distribution platform,” she said.
Wu showed for the second time at Toronto Fashion Week with his “Hierarchy of Needs” Fall 2012 collection, which sparked several questions from the media and the fashion industry about the message behind his designs.
Paul Gottfried replies:
Again with the support of Islamic countries, the US invaded Afghanistan and Iraq.
I handed him two condoms in a way that said “What do I do with these?”. He took them from me and played with the square packaging in his hand for a second.
This game looks like it might have some legs on it since I'm twenty hours in and only in the first or second chapter of the game. I've been surprised that actions have consequences - a doofus statement I know but how many games promise this and the consequence is worthless or absurd? I saved a cat from a tree later I received a sandwich from the cat's owner. Derp. Not all the secondary quests have blinky lights over their heads so tracking them down makes for some fun in the game. There are one or two parts I've gotten a little frustrated at but I figure answers will be forthcoming.
This he does with the completely delicious Gemma Atherton playing an immortal called Io. Why, FFS? I mean why give her the name of the woman who was turned into a white cow? She says herself that she was being propositioned by a god who, when she rebuffed him, cursed her with agelessness. Don't know who that was but it sure wasn't poor old bewitched and be-uddered Io. Why didn't Mr Movie Mogul ask for her to be given a all-purpose Greek-sounding name? Chloe, say, or Zoe?
Cried tears and sobbed, because it gave me a chance to show them that I am human and need comfort too.
“A door got ripped off and the side of the plane got smashed in – we all got covered in glass.
ALOR SETAR – Tunku Laksamana Kedah, Tunku Mansor Tunku Kassim today lodged a police report over the Kedah State Legislative Assembly’s amending of an enactment to give absolute power to the state mufti and fatwa comittee.
I've had about a half-dozen Upright beers now and been impressed by each, but I think the Gose was the most interesting.
A nice chat with Mike OE5MSM. I was being hassled by the Station Manager to get the lunch made so couldn't talk for longer, and the Android smart-phone fell over when it received an email, part way through too!
So imagine my reaction when a whiny 7-year-old American mini-tourist was drooping upside down and backwards over the seat in front of me, complaining with the classic "Are we there yet?" to his mother. I wanted to straighten his little t-shirted shoulders and say, "Yes, we ARE there yet, junior -- we're in Paris. Look out the window!" But as the mother of a former 7-year-old boy, I knew better. I leaned over and said in a stage whisper, "You know, a really good trick while riding the bus or walking in Paris is to see how many lions you can count." OK, I have to pat myself on the back for that gem because immediately he and his older sister and their father were sitting up tall in their seats, craning their necks to find stone lions. "There are 4!!" they shouted at the Hotel de Ville. So until they got off the bus they were busy and happy campers.
Is this a beginning or an ending? Not much room left to write, Virgil. Your pages are full, and I’m so tired.
Instead of taking Mikayla to meet Santa for the first time, I take Jonathan alone. And as he climbs up on Santa's lap, I get a tear in my eye thinking of what should have been. I cannot help myself. I try to do all of the things that everyone expects me to do, but I just cannot seem to do them with a true joy in my heart. It's not that I don't desire for my feelings to be different, I want to enjoy all of the usually wonderful things about this season, but I am just having a difficult time figuring out how to do that most days.
If you find the beer sells, but moves noticeably slower than normal, and in addition you receive only lukewarm praise for it, or indeed no praise at all, make a mental note not to order that one again. The brewery concerned may still phone you, especially if they are looking for repeat orders. Again, tell them the truth about the bad experience you have had with their beer. At the end of the day you have the final say, and it is your reputation as a good licensee/cellarman that is at stake here.
Good afternoon! And happy Monday. I can honestly say, happy Monday now, because I no longer dislike mondays, because I am now on maternity leave!!!! So it really doesn't matter what day of the week it is, lol, I get to be at home with my little girl, until the baby arrives, then I will get to be at home with my girls!!! I can't wait!
I have no outdoor access.
Daily, in a spritz-bottle as a refresher or to straighten edges or stretch hair to style.
So I’d go around struttin’ my mental stuff, thinking I was all that. No technical issues anyone would throw at me would be left unanswered.
We had a glorious weekend all together. We spent Saturday afternoon on the lake with kayaks. We had ours and borrowed a friend's and we all piled in. It was a gorgeous afternoon with lots of kayaks and canoes on the lake. We stopped several times and picked lots of wild blackberries and later made homemade ice cream. Ryan even taught the boys to cliff jump, much to my dismay. However, the "cliff" was about 2-3 feet high and they jumped to Ryan's arms. William still can't swim since his broviac is still in, but he wasn't missing the swimming this time as his brothers were gasping from the frigid temperature of the water.
Deicide - Headliners, Louisville, KY USA 02-28-2011 (HD) dvd 1
Posted by Melanie Rickey, Fashion Editor at Large
Typically, these statistics are based on annual reporting of variables that are easy to gather from existing databases. Publication is also annual. The producers of statistics do not make the full data sets available for researchers to play with. They select the tables and the cross-tabulations we are allowed to study. The regular print publications are characterized by lots of numbers and very superficial analyses. They do not, I would say, train their readers to appreciate statistics.
Could never be swayed.
Micah - You say kind words and mean words
I don’t know what the deal is with people lately but everyone is so damn crabby! I’m so tired of dealing with crabby people. They are at work, at home, at school, at stores…what is the deal?! Is there something in the water? I came home to one pissy ass mother! Asking me what I do around here and how “fucking lazy” I am! WTF?! I have 4 jobs AND keep up with my part of house work!! My brother…he has zero jobs, failed out of college, and sits on his ass playing Xbox all day! And she’s bitching at me!?! It just pisses me off so bad and today it’s pissing me off more than normal.
Are descriptions accessible to all employees?
Hot In Cleveland (WINNER)
As always, thanks for reading.
10. Can you handle the truth?
I wish it wasn't such a struggle to create at the moment - my head is full of ideas but it's too tiring to do much with any of them. Still, there's a glimmer of light at the end of the tunnel now and I can't wait to see if this new drug lives up to the promise.
I’ve published a couple of articles recently on using an Obihai device as a gateway between Asterisk and Google Voice, and by necessity I had to make reference to F—PBX because that’s the only way I know how to do some things. But as I said in the censored post in that thread, I truly wish I had never heard of F—PBX, and I’m really not so hot on Asterisk anymore either. Anyway, I think I’m going to stop reading, or responding to threads in the PiaF forum. It appears I will not be missed (in fact they’ll probably throw a party) and I am sure I can find other, probably more productive ways to spend my time.
SGML addresses this fact by affording web authors the ability to describe tag sets by use of a declarative tag set document. Document Type Definitions (DTD) is one category of tag set documents.
Williamsburg AleWerks Ironbound Ale
So lets just say that if you want to "walk off" the calories consumed in a meal at Peter Luger you will have to RUN 17 MILES. That is why we are fat.and it was a great lunch. Yea, I just put that in one sentence.
Don’t ask me why I went and looked at my own dormant myspace page, for the first time in several years. Long ago, in 2005, in fact, I posted this there; seems worthy of replication on this under-nourished blog, so here goes:
But, it tasted lovely. We ate in 3 days.
stir occasionally until it begins to set
Now I want to talk about my neighborhood. I think it's a sign of a great neighborhood when people are as likely to greet a neighbor with friendly words as they are the homeless man who regularly pushes a grocery cart down the middle of the street.
There are about 500 pictures I have to go through before I can even begin to post them, so I'll try to get to that later. We had a blast, it was a cowgirl theme, and the girl loved her cake (was there any doubt?). There were all kinds of surprises and it was a terrific day. I also realized how much better things are if I let people help me instead of trying to micro-manage every part of a party. Bring on the help!
John 1:19-23… In this passage of Scripture, the priests and the Levites came to John and asked, “Who are you?… Are you Elias… Are you that prophet… What do you say about yourself?” Today, many would say, “Tell me about yourself.” “Give me a short bio.” John the Baptist said that he was not the Christ… “I am not Elijah”… John said instead, “I am the voice of one crying in the wilderness” (Mark 1:3), and proceeded to speak of making straight the way of the Lord… John was schooled in the wilderness by the Holy Spirit. There, in the wilderness, he was “all mind”… “all ears”… “all eyes”… He was hearing… he was learning… he was preparing… but when he came out, he was a voice. What a word for those who would lead, teach, or speak… Leaders (preachers) must be all mind in their study… all ears… listening to what the Spirit is saying… but in the pulpit, they must be all voice. In other words… they must have a message for the hour. It’s sad to say, but with all the books, with all the study aids that preachers have today, and with all the degrees that they received, they still have no “voice” (message). They may have a lesson or a sermon… but it was their lesson… not the Spirit’s…
Back to onions.
Second, it's a Mets card.
In this book there are a couple of things going on. First, Benjamin (Mr. Mann’s oldest child) discovers that his report card has some terrible grades on it; grades that will force him to undergo some of that frightening punishment that his father is known for. Because he doesn’t want to face his father’s wrath, and so he can go to a hype party that’s happening that night, Benjamin lets his bestfriend (Darnell Wallace) talk him into lying to his father. When you read the book, you’ll see that lying was a huge mistake. The second problem is that Mr. Mann’s eleven-year-old daughter, Kayla, is having problems with a bully (Anthony Jones) from school, and we all know how father’s behave when they find out that their precious daughters are being mistreated by some knuckleheaded boy. Their reactions are rarely pretty. When these two problems are brought to Bryan Mann’s attention, he decides to take out two birds with one horrifying punishment. That’s how Benjamin, Darnell, and Anthony find themselves stranded in the middle of the woods with monsters all around them.
So todays image is the reveal as well as a birthday hop!
Solntse - This Russian entrant is seeking to win the competition through sheer sail power. Measuring 5 km in diameter, the mass of the sail exceeds the mass of the hull by a factor of 8 to 1. Some have frowned upon the use of nuclear technology to power control and communication systems, where all other teams have relied on photovoltaic cells. The response from the design team has been, "Russian technology likes abuse! It's simple and robust. Let's see how well those photovoltaic systems from the other teams work once they're out past the Kuiper Belt". Scheduled to launch later this year. Sponsor: Vladimir Khodorkovsky, heir of oligarch. Widely mocked for his perpetual tan and habit of strutting on Black Sea beaches. Odds: 20 to 1.
Who knew this was so hard?
Anywho, this is a quick post! I’m in the middle of my 6th load of laundry today (YIKES!) so I have to get back to it!
The book, Segreto - Guide to Finishing Beautiful Interiors - is a stunner. The pictures of the interiors are simply beautiful. Leslie has worked some of the prettiest houses - and the book is filled with them - page after page. It is an absolutely gorgeous book, one of the prettiest published this year.
So, let me know how serious you are Greg; cause if you are only fucking around with a few little thoughts cause you are fucking bored, or some such shit. DON'T WASTE MY FUCKING TIME. BUT IF YOU ARE GODDAMN FUCKING SERIOUS, I'LL FUCKING LISTEN TO YOU. I'LL MEET YOU HALFWAY.
You can follow me on twitter: @gianni_saw
I loved many things about this one. I loved the writing. There's just something special about it. I loved the way the the author told Audrey's story. For example,
I bring this little review to an end with a postscript about the song with which Eric ends Birds of Relocation, “Fighting for Life.” As I said before, this is a song of utterly realistic and utterly exultant resolve. Its realism is evident in the quiet, thoughtful beginning, and the acknowledgment that “in a little while, the ghosts return to noise.” In short, Eric is realistic enough to know that life under the sun does not afford us a place where we can put troubles so far behind us that they can’t reappear in our rearview mirrors. But Eric’s duly noting that is simply a deep breath – the intake of air before he unleashes, with that glorious voice, a rousing final trumpet blast:
Since a baby or toddler cannot comprehend nor perform these tests the way older children and adults can, so the baby must be sedated and the exercises must be done for them. Click here to see Mark performing a set of PFTs last year.
Perhaps the moral codes and social values were too harsh, but they kept families and communities together, unlike in the broken and dysfunctional society we now inhabit.
His smile brightened her heart
Please tell me I am not the only one that does this! :) It sounds terrible, but I promise, it's not as bad as it sounds.
CRANKY
You will need to cut some 1 1/2” strips from your printed fabric and 2” strips from your white fabric. For a scrappy look I recommend that you use a variety of different fabrics. I have about 16 different fabrics that I am using in this tutorial. For those of you that are trying to figure out yardage for larger projects, 16 strips that were 1 1/2” by 22” (the length of a fat quarter) made about 2 1/2 blocks. You will also need 4 – 2” by 4 1/2” rectangles of the white for each block.
I can't use spray paint until it gets a bit warmer here, so this was a bit of an experiment. But it worked well!
wherever he strolls, he is known
& I reopened it to the wrong page,
Past the lockers is the laundry room.
John 6:27
BARMAN - (With admirable generosity of spirit...) Well I never!
“Somewhere someone is thinking of you. Someone is calling you an angel. This person is using celestial colors to paint your image. Someone is making you into a vision so beautiful that it can only live in the mind. Someone is thinking of the way your breath escapes your lips when you are touched. How your eyes close and your jaw tightens with concentration as you give pleasure a home. These thoughts are saving a life somewhere right now. In some airless apartment on a dark, urine stained, whore lined street, someone is calling out to you silently and you are answering without even being there. So crystalline. So pure. Such life saving power when you smile. You will never know how you have cauterized my wounds. So sad that we will never touch. How it hurts me to know that I will never be able to give you everything I have."”
Pedigree, in my opinion, is a lovely beer, when kept well. I've had some terrible examples of it - many when checking it in the cellar at the pub before it's ready - and I've always found it ages well.
The Danes should hold fast, even if the Muslims burn cars in Nørrebro and embassies in Amman.
collectively respond to Mr. Shakil’s treatment of his former tenants.
The feast felt like hours, as we drank ourselves into a stupor. Some boys ending kissing the serving girls. The man came through, eyeing people off with his stern face and big grey beard, telling them it was time to be quiet and to sit down, I finished off my tenth goblet of wine by the time the halls were silent.
Soothing creme moisturises hands, leaving a healthy appearance and skin feeling smooth and refreshed.
My sister in law’s wedding, which was the impetus for this blog in the first place, is now a month away. This is my check-list for things I must do to prepare myself for my cake-bake-a-thon, cast in the form of a recipe. Can any of you more knowledgeable readers please tell me if I am leaving something ridiculously obvious and vital out?
Cootchie Coo by Charlie Feathers
Ain't No Diesel Trucks In Heaven by Bob Wayne
The necessity of connectivity
you both took the same detour
It takes time to get to know it and its occupants; the different moods, quirkiness, the versatile traits, both negative and positive. It takes time to settle in and although I have lived here for almost six months, I am still establishing new routines and my own place - not just in the new house but also in my new life.
No wonder society is so screwed up! We tell the kids one thing and the parents something else. — Barry
1/2 cup light corn syrup
So much for not bitching about those things. Glad to be back, ya'll!
I saw this photo of her at her funeral not long ago and had to do something special with it to remember her by. I have so many special memories of her - she made my wedding cake I remember helping in her kitchen - she made sure I did my bit and the dishes! The smell of her house - the back room, Uncle Don's back yard and strawberries - the little things like the toilet roll cover!!
(3 gifts red)
I don't have any screenshots or videos of the game, but there's plenty of them on Steam or the games' main website. More videos and reviews are to come. I think the next review I'll do will be for Muramasa.
So let’s assume you have had your epiphany. You’ve had a long hard look at your wardrobe. OK it’s not so bad that you can’t even give it away to OxFam but it needs serious work. It might be that you are at a significant moment: a new career or you’ve hit thirty and decided you better start dressing like a grown-up. Whatever the stimulus you’ve decided you need to build a gentleman’s wardrobe. The big problem is that you don’t really have a lot of spare cash to spend on what is a minor issue in the grand scheme of things like rent or a mortgage, university fees, loan payments or children who are outgrowing their clothing at an alarming rate.
Hello Kitty Greetings-pg. 66 Clouds 3/4"
Stir.
First within their souls, then with their eyes, and then again through their children.
Meanwhile, when the sun came out a fragment of verse came to mind: “after the sun the rain, after the rain the sun, this be our way of life, till our work be done” or something like that. It comes from a song I mentioned before (last year) and is copied below. The sentiment is true, I suppose, and it reminds me of the story of the man who was phoned by his son who was in a bit of a state.
Magi: 227
Uh huh. First off, again, intent doesn't matter but I question when ppl say that the person meant no harm... maybe consciously they didn't, because all they were thinking was that it was hilarious and only their amusement mattered, but the hilarity comes at the expense of others... so there's harm... the only reason people can honestly claim "I meant no harm" was cuz they were too busy thinking of themselves and how hilarious a racial insult was to them, that they weren't thinking about the effect on the other person, but the hilarity still comes at the expense of others. So maybe they meant no harm, but they meant a joke where the humour comes FROM harm. -_-
﻿Today saw the start of 1st Finchfield Rainbows 4 week drama course. Start of a little journey for them really as some of the rainbows have never encountered performance or drama before. So it was all very exciting for them and also very exciting for myself. The last time I was there doing anything particularly drama based was a few years back when I took a puppet project there. (Newhampton Gang) Was a college TIE project. Basically we had to create a piece of touring theatre that was "Theatre In Education"
Time to start drinking, that is. Those are the words that ring in my head to this day, often when I see excessive drinking or bars. I see a guy on a catamaran making a smug, confident statement that the serious and necessary business of getting drunk was a job to be done without question and that apparently, 4:30 PM was the beginning of the work shift, when responsible workers know that It's Time To Start :)
Well I can't believe this is my first post for 2012. That is so wrong in quite a few ways. But very soon there will be many posts as I have a lot of catching up to do.
Claire C
One more thought for now. Where are places you can give something away FREE that will raise interest in you and your book? Consider this: If you have created an e-book, once the basic production cost has been paid, it costs basically nothing to send out beyond a little computer time. Think about finding places you could offer your e-book FREE to anyone who writes to request it. Consider law enforcement people and other first-responders; how about a gift for any and every military service person; missionaries and helps missions around the world? How many might love to read a free e-book, then tell a friend or buy your hardback? Consider clubs, companies and organizations that might offer your e-book at their next annual meeting or corporate fundraiser. If you’re going to pay for some kind of advertising, why not “pay” by sending out a FREE copy of your e-book so the word will spread?
11. Clean your cast iron pan. I love cooking in cast iron, but it can be a pain to clean. Pour some club soda into the pan and let it soak for a while. Club soda does a beautiful job of breaking down the grease making tit much easier to clean.
This service is going to up and running in a couple of weeks and judging by the window display there is going to be a lot of adult novelty fairytale character costumes in very unforgiving fabrics up for hire. I'm not sure I would want to be hiring any of these after they are "worn".
2.) This award is for any co-blogging friend who has cheered you along in your blog building, craft advancing career.
Demjanjuk was convicted, and in 1988, he received a death sentence. In most countries, that would be the end of the story save for the line about his death by hanging or stoning, but Demjanjuk wasn’t convicted in “most countries.” He was convicted in Israel—one of those minority nations that has a workable justice system that isn’t directly ruled by hysteria or a drug mafia.
12. 何も始まらなかった一日の終わりに。
Trying to make up my mind what e-reader to buy; it doesn’t have to be all-singing all-dancing – I only want to use it to read but it has to be light and easy to carry. My bag is full of gadgets as it is!
When they speak, God is speaking.
Tomorrow I will have a preview of the next big Precocious Paper update that is happening May 1st. You'll want to be the first to get in on the new goodies and a special deal :). Thanks for stopping by today! Tessa
Tuesday, November 15 - 7 pm MST, 9 pm Eastern
Luke had no intentions of helping anyone, least of all four destitute Amish. He had cattle to get to market. Besides, what happens when Amish meets the Wild West? Will they be able to mix?
I want whisper in her ear all the mistakes I made so she wouldn't repeat them. I want to make sure she loves herself as much as she should.
They find him in the dressing room, still in his kit
Route 66 through Albuquerque is well represented by some of those old motor courts that later became motor-hotels from which the word motel was coined. It was a grand thing to “Get Your Kicks on 66.” The old road may be gone but ABQ has seen fit to permit and encourage refurbishing and protecting many of the old places and especially the neon signs that remain on what’s left of 66.
These ladies will start the last week of April. So be watching for their wonderful creations!!
In fact, women are much more comfortable in giving nonverbal cues to men b/c it takes the onus off of us to have be the one who is coming off as the pursuer and/or we feel we don’t have to DIRECTLY say how we are feeling that may make a situation awkward or uncomfortable. IOW’s a woman would rather send nonverbal cues that say “I have no interest. Not feeling you in that way” than have to come out directly and say it. Unfortunately, a lot of men push women to the latter b/c they overlook very tell signs of non interest. As a result the woman either ignores him or tells him flat out it’s not that kind of party.
For example, he knew that there were 549 storefronts, among them 34 grocery stores, 28 tailors, 21 hair dressers, 21 butchers, 14 candy stores, 14 saloons, 10 laundries and 8 undertakers, along with a variety of other establishments.
Finally, Emma was on a role as sheriff this week, sorting through the lies and hidden loyalties of Mr. Gold and Sidney Glass/’The Magic Mirror’. After confronting Sidney about the bug he planted in her office, she sees through his lies when he later confesses to setting-up Mary Margaret for murder, under the watchful gaze of Regina/’The Evil Queen’. (I was heartbroken for Sidney, sacrificing himself for his lady love and getting absolutely nothing in return. His pain made me tear up a little bit, I’m not even going to try and deny it.) Emma sees through it immediately–signaling the return of her super ability to tell when someone is lying–and accuses Regina of setting up the entire thing. When Regina protests, Emma stands her ground, and, in a sudden burst of self-righteous energy, demands her son, Henry, be returned to her.
We know you put a lot of effort into creating cards and goodies to show the ones you love how much you care. And while some are very personal, some are ones you just want to share. And we’d love to see them.
My cousin A is engaged to W. W is allergic to nuts. I didn't know this but I never have get togethers at my place where I have to coordinate food and food preparation. My mother apparently was aware of her allergy as was my Aunt and Grandmother. My mother made a side dish with broccoli, bacon, red grapes, and walnuts. She failed to tell W that there were nuts in the salad. W took a bite, realized what she'd eaten and nudged Cousin A while tapping her plate subtly with her fork as if to say "did you see that?" My Uncle D saw this movement and thought she was saying "what the hell is this crap!?" He was getting ready to tease her about thinking our food is bad when she asked my mother if there were nuts in the broccoli side. You should have seen my mother's face! Oh Em Gee! I think she wanted to die right there. She's all apologizing to W for not remembering to tell her there were nuts in one of the sides, W is all apologizing to my mother for not asking her if there were nuts in the side... Then poor W starts chugging Coke in an attempt to flush any walnut residue out of her throat.
It was quite large and central and served both sides, with a dram shop hatch in the centre facing the door. Something about it reminded me of the one at the Commercial in Wheelock, or in some of the Holts houses in Manchester. I have no idea if this is an original bar structure but I would like to go back and see it from the bar room to perhaps get a clearer idea.
A measure of the dishonesty, disloyalty and corruption of Derek Clark was that not only had he trumped up charges against Peter Baker to seize control of the East Midlands committee he was horrified and had Gerard Batten refuse to admit witnesses to the Show Trial he had dishonestly and incompetently tried to orchestrate - knowing that the witnesses would show he, Derek Clark, for the liar he is!
**Note: Here is the first part of our food adventure
I just put stickers on the front of canning jars filled with candy corn. I have electric tea lights from the dollar store inside but I forgot to light them for the picture! Whoops!
I turned on a classic rock station, and to my delight they were playing softer tunes than usual. We both loved that real old school rock and roll, but now the moment required something a little more delicate, something soothing.
This is my submission for Flourishes Noon Time Challenge : The Round Challenge. We are being challenged to use a circle as the base of our cards and the rest of the design is up to us. If you would like to join us and be in the running to win some of Flourishes great stamps, you can find out all the details HERE.
shooting towards an anti-solar spot,
If you would like a slightly longer stay, there are also still places available on the brocante tour that I am hosting here in September. This will be a wonderful tour including accommodation at the chateau d'Emalleville belonging to my friend Frederique, Antique shopping in local stores, a major antique fair and a couple of smaller fairs. A meal at my home and visits to places of interest in our lovely valley. If you'd like more information don't hesitate to contact me.
i can't really get photos of the entire wall because of the tight corners
Now I had to find the material to create her dream! That's one of the biggest challenges when one is working with recycled materials. I searched for over a month to find the right items. Fortunately, I've build a number of great relationships over the years with scrap dealers all around the country and able to scavenge around their facilities. I found a full size air tank in one state and half of it became the fire pit you see with me in the picture. I then found another piece of curved steel plate in another state and created the Tiki figure on the top step. Look closely and you'll see his flaming hair.
Clean and Simple
That is something that I've felt since I was a child. Was it because perhaps the bragging that I did hear at the time came from other children? "I'm buying a ______"; "We're going to ________ for winter break"; "Do you like my ____________ jeans?"
Speaker: The truth is a lie.
Single
I bought it :D
As with real estate, so with brewing, a huge aspect of a successful venture is location, location, location. Jacob managed to find a place where the water was abundant and eminently suitable for brewing:
Unfortunately, life doesn't always work out the way we have planned. I do not have any of my own children, for a multitude of reasons both in and out of my control. And Mom no longer has any recollection of our Easter Egg hunts. Somehow, I am okay with that. It keeps the magic alive for me, even as a grown adult.
Evans -v- Evans was a similar New South Wales case inasmuch as it also involved a promise and the promise being relied on. In this case dad bought a house and let his Daughter and Son in Law move in rent free. He promised them both that the house was "...your home" and allowed them to do renovations and improvements over the years. Eventually, in 2007 when the Daughter asked her dad to transfer the house to her and her Husband, dad refused.
"Does getting shot hurt much?" she asked."Like a mule kicked me.""Hmm. I've never been daft enough to let that happen."-p.50
01. Embryo
There are some out there who only have faded, distant memories of such times and for them, I can understand. The happiness of Christmas is only a twinkling memory in many minds and we can only think about the here and now, the times when everything is too much to bear sometimes and makes us only want to cower in a corner and shut out the rest of the world. I hear you. All that I can say to you is: think back to when you can remember opening that first Christmas present on a chilly December 25th morning while the folks looked on happily, knowing that for all the work, bills and toil that awaited them after today, at least NOW was good.
BIRD STUDY GROUP – Meets the first Wednesday of the month, September – May
Without further ado, I'd like to introduce the subject of this week's posts, Martha:
Again this was for work but my friend and I took this opportunity and stayed for one more night using our own pocket money to enjoy ourselves.
'I'll take it.
Instead of re-applying DoTs just every time they fall off, you should try to re-apply while you’re in an Eclipse state. You need a timer for this, there’s no getting around it. See Add-Ons at the bottom for suggestions.
It's similar to hosting the radio show, because in both instances I get to live a fantasy life for a brief time before checking back in with the real world. It's an escape, but a healthy one (usually). ;)
But if you want your child or children to actually eat what they requested make it a rule that the extra curricular activities come after the meal.
Walt Disney Animation Studios returns to the Hundred Acre Wood with “Winnie the Pooh.” Featuring the timeless charm, wit and whimsy of the original featurettes, this all-new movie reunites audiences with the philosophical “bear of very little brain” and friends Tigger, Rabbit, Piglet, Owl, Kanga, Roo—and last, but certainly not least, Eeyore, who has lost his tail. “Ever have one of those days where you just can’t win, Eeyore?” asks Pooh. Owl sends the whole gang on a wild quest to save Christopher Robin from an imaginary culprit. It turns out to be a very busy day for a bear who simply set out to find some honey. Inspired by three stories from A.A. Milne’s books in Disney’s classic, hand-drawn art style, “Winnie the Pooh” hits theaters on July 15th!
When I was saying, “I Killed Kenny Rogers” in 1999, it was not to be seen as a compliment.
The changes to income tax maintain the Talmudic-Marxist system of Graduated Income Tax, which is stated in the Communist Manifesto and the Protocols of Zion as a prerequisite for the global enslavement of the people in a materialistic One World State. Income tax is an obscenity which was introduced as a temporary measure during the Napoleonic Wars. The Bogeyman, Napoleon Bonaparte, is long dead, but Income Tax continues. UK Politicians have lied to the people since Pitt the Younger's time, at the very latest! Income should not be taxed. What a man earns belongs to him, and of course, likewise for a woman. Rather than tinker with taxation of earnings, if the government really wanted to help the people, they would abolish Income Tax, and instead garner all revenue by indirect taxation of non-essential material goods, and by imposing taxes on larger businesses, thus supporting small traders and penalising corporations with no loyalty to the country, let alone the local economy.
Almost up into the sky.
I don't have a photo of it, but Pete has also done a great job of painting the garage door so that rusty stripe down the center is gone. And here's my festive porch.... with the new blue door that I completely love!
Sheikh Abdullah bin Muhammad bin Humaid was the former Chief Justice of Saudi Arabia and Imam of the Grand Mosque of Mecca. His son Salih is the current Imam of the Grand Mosque of Mecca as well as the head of the Saudi Consultative Council.
The deceased is laid out with their head facing North. The kimono is worn with the right side over the left - the opposite of how it's worn in life. All orifices are stuffed with cotton. Shortly after the person dies (or shortly before), you wet their lips. We did it using strips of paper, but I've read online that Shinto practice uses cotton swabs on the ends of chopsticks.We then lit an incense stick and placed it in the pot above his head. Then you ring a little bell three times and clasp your hands in prayer.
I’m in that strange time of year here at Beer Rant HQ, folks. The weather is cooperating and the ambient daytime temperature is in the 50’s so I can stock up on beer. I’m also heading in to that time of year when the in-laws visit and that’s the time of year when there’s no beer drinking while the folks are around. (Granted, I can make all the stops at Old World Brewery that I want to.) The dilemma: Balancing the amount of beers in the ready room (the fridge) versus the number of days I have until the folks actually arrive. I’m told wheels down this trip will be Monday or Tuesday of next week so I’m carefully balancing out what’s in the garage cabinet against what’s chilling in the batter’s box. And in keeping with this bit of a bind, I only picked up two six-packs today at Total Wine (both qualified for the $1 off, of course). What’d I get? Well, a six pack of Kalamazoo Stout from Bells Brewing and a six-pack of Odell Red Ale. One I know (Kalamazoo Stout) and one’s new to me (Red Ale). I figure, even if I’m wrong, I’ll only be half wrong! (Yes, the Bells is not a Western Beer. I didn't say I'd give up "other" beers completely.)
I'll be washing the diapers in one of our sinks (we have a double sink in our master bath - one we don't really use) most likely with dawn, and hanging them to dry on our drying rack that I use for our diapers anyways. I'm hoping to sneak them outside in the morning for a few, but my neighbors suck.
Also, I want to make clear that I’m in no way trying to imply that all users of heroin are junkies digging through the garbage — but in a poor, developing country like Vietnam (or the shameful ghettos of the USA) I do feel leaving bags full of used syringes on the side of the street is a very, very bad idea.
During preparation of an October story about Jones, the Journal-World learned evidence in the case had been preserved, and could possibly still be tested. A day after the story was published, the Topeka Police Cold Case Unit reopened the rape case and later produced the DNA profile match with Russell.
I stayed with my friend in Dublin and was walking every day 5 km to Rds along the South Circular Road in Dublin. The city is absolutely stunning so I felt in love with it.
Safari Park, Escondido
Please tell me I am not the only crafter that has done this:) I had not blocked it and I want to add a little paw embellishment (the family has just bought the most adorable chocolate Labrador)
Here’s another example of effective placement:
More when I keg.
One of the best techniques of meditation is by using candle. Keep a lightened candle and continuously gaze its inner flame (the red part of the flame). Try to concentrate on the flame. While you concentrate on the flame, you forget the world and for few seconds you are fully concentrated on the candle. This is called meditation. This enhances your concentration power and also gives peace to your mind. The state of total null or void is known as meditation. Your mind is free from worldly chaos and worries. It is free from the bad spirits. Daily practice will increase your mediation time and help to improve concentration. This would accelerate your mind activity and your will feel more energetic and happy.
1) In the 1700s, sailors would sometimes strike or lower their ship’s sails as a symbol of their refusal to go to sea. From this refusal to acquiesce with the requirements of the work day we get the term ‘strike’ and this poster playfully toys with both meanings. In 1888, young girls in London were forced to dip matches in dangerous white phosphorous for 14 hours at a stretch. After one of their numbers was unjustly fired, they went on strike. Thus the match blossoming with the starry night flame indicates both the match girl’s strike of 1888 and the underlying flame that occurs when a match is struck. Floating in the upper darkness of the poster are two cats. A general strike—which is what is being called for—is also sometimes termed a wild cat strike because it is not authorized by a union and hence is ‘wild’. Anarchists and IWW affiliates will often use cats or sabot-cats in their graphics as well. The woman is likely either Hispanic or Afro American; both races (and gender) have been roundly abused by a system that would rather produce matches than well rounded humans.
GrapeScience.com: This site informs readers about research on the health benefits of the Concord grape in areas like heart health, cognitive health, immune system health and more.
-Why I had a 5th degree tear.
It strikes me that so frequently we succumb to the wrong language for expressing ourselves.
I’d been a fan of Metheny’s music since hearing 1980′s American Garage and my following was bolstered by his last release of that year with keyboardist Lyle Mays (who’s been with Metheny almost from the beginning of his recording career), As Falls Wichita, So Falls Wichita Falls. But my trust in his consistency was sealed with 1981′s release of Offramp with the Pat Metheny Group.
So, anyhow in my crazy acceptance as an enfadosa mom when my kid started school, I picked up some of his artwork, blobs and all, and asked him: What is this?
And the creative juices? They are not flowing. Rather, they are stagnating and fermenting, like my sour, bloaty stomach.
Now, why would a Martian look like this? Gravity on Mars is only 38 per cent of what it is on earth, hence everything would be easier to push, pull, pick up and carry. If everything weighs less, there would be less need for muscle, hence the reed-like limbs.
- Carl Schmitt, Politische Theologie (1922)
It would have been interesting to see the dynamics of Jesus’ family as he was growing up. History tells us that he was about 30 when he entered the ministry and only ministered for about three years before being brutally murdered. That means that most of his life was lived in the ‘family setting’.
I do think this will be a hit or miss book though. For me it was a miss mainly because I did NOT feel the romance or connection between Gemma Hardy and Mr. Sinclair, her employer.
Why not to watch: You’re more scared than I am.
5. Coach Team Members to Solve Their Own Problems – Many leaders think of coaching as telling and advising others on how to solve a problem. Today’s coaching is about expanding people’s awareness and getting them to think for themselves. Next time a team member comes to your office and asks you to solve a problem, don’t solve it for them. Teach them to problem solve by asking them what they think they should do. Then get back to your work, as they put their solutions into action.
I've made doughnuts from scratch before, but they haven't turned out too well. Using the deep fat fryer is kind of a pain and you really have to be careful not to make your doughnuts too big or they will be raw in the middle. Still, when you get it right, they are awesome.
1 flat
these ladies are eating machines...
We then ran all three layers through the Big Shot using the Pillow Box die - so easy!
All dates, acts and ticket prices subject to change without notice. Ticket
Now don't you worry, his hair is growing back. I see new growth as we speak. Unfortunately this will probably be his life, seeing as though he is my son. Sweet Silas, this kind of stuff is what happens to mommy. I'm sorry that it seems to be a generational thing.
Living here in the South, which prides itself on having true blue patriotism encoded in its very DNA you would figure we would be bending over backwards to support the members of the Armed Forces and their families. Now since all things are relative yeah, I would have to say that on average goodwill and pride towards the troops is overabundant but it pretty much stops there.
Double Knockout
OK, I thought. Scam victims don't always want to share everything at the outset; hopefully Gross would change his mind. We emailed back and forth a few more times--and then, all at once, good news: Gross and his attorney had confirmed with one of the sponsors, "the trustees from Merrill Lynch," that the contest was real and he had really won it! Yippee! Oh, and by the way, would I please share Tad Williams' email address (I'd interviewed Williams a few months earlier) so he could confirm directly that Williams had really been a contest judge, and that the blurb he'd gotten from Williams was genuine?
All in all, I am not blown away by this game. I know that I will play a few more maps in it, check out the Santuary fraction a bit more, maybe even the Stronghold once again, but other than that, the other towns holds no charm for me and that is really bringing the game DOWN. When you start walking past creatures on the adventure map, not because you can’t beat them, but because you can’t be bothered because they are too silly or ugly or annoying, then you know that this is not a game you will play much.
(sorry about the image quality, checking out a new camera and I haven't quite figured it out.)
10. Gaby - Bailalo Asi
“What?” I ask.
Tense and slashing raga-punk rave-up stretched to the breaking point.
Did it :0) Two men fragrances here first is Green Tweed from Elements very yummy and the second is Southern Gardens Burberry for Men and it sticks forever. I have soap made with this fragrance from Nine months ago and it is as strong and fragrant as the day it was cut :-) . Off now to do a Pop mica swirl with a new fragrance I have which is a dupe of Vera Wangs Pink :-). I soaped a dupe of her princess a few weeks back and it really is beautiful. Oh how I love fragrance..............Staff at work tell me that they always know when I am working as they can smell the soaps as they walk past the office door :-) At least I am smelly in a nice way LOL
I made a bunch of these little cards to distribute to either adults in the community who are in need of a boost, or to send out to one of the many organizations out there in "blogland" who provide encouraging cards to children who are ill or homeless.
"Do not think that I came to bring peace on earth. I did not come to bring peace but a sword. For I have come to set a man against his father, a daughter against her mother, and a daughter-in-law against her mother-in-law; and a man's enemies will be those of his own household. He who loves father or mother more than Me is not worthy of Me. And he who loves son or daughter more than Me is not worthy of Me." (Matthew
I'm still planning on holding the free group break I promised when I broke 100 followers. Just waiting for that tax return to get here.
I have loved Bunnicula since I was little!!
Be sure to enter my Cutting Edge Stencils giveaway, going on until Friday.
Genre: Historical Fiction/Family Saga
2 strictly
Tired of waiting in lines? Frustrated with the new cashier at your favorite grocery store? Exhausted from filling out rebate paperwork?
This president went before the United Nations and castigated Israel for building settlements. He said nothing about thousands of rockets being rained in on Israel from the Gaza Strip. This president threw –
During Lowvelder’s investigation, the reason for the influx of illegal immigrants through the border fence became clear, as there was no maintenance or patrols.” The investigative team was able to drive for more than 10 kilometres along this entire fence-road, without any sign of soldiers or visible patrols. Permanent entrances - found every couple of metres - were created in the fence with the use of small branches, giving easy access to any. “ Lt Col Leonard Hlathi, provincial police spokesman, was not available for comment this past week.
Step back, look up.
-What more is life about
NATO OUSTED GADDAFI TO PLACE AL QUEDA IN POWER. AL QUEDA PLAYED THE WEST LIKE A GUITAR TO DO THEIR DIRTY WORK FOR THEM AND LOOK AT THEM LAUGHING NOW.
Sew Easy- We are Memory Keepers
The final segment is so brazen and absolutely crazy that it works because it’s such a simple idea. Taking the premise that mixed race kids will make the world a better place because races won’t fight if they’re all combined, John decides to ease the tension between Israel and Palestine by travelling to a sperm bank in Israel. John’s a Jew so he’s able to make a donation, but when he gets in the room he gives the cup to his Palestinian sound operator who then jerks off into it… while John and the cameraman are still in the room – just to make it weird I suppose. After handing in the cup across the border to Palestine they go… Needless to say more weirdness and hilarity ensue.
2. St. Louis Rams OL Matt Kalil (USC) I think the Rams could use a lot of help and it starts with the OL which could not keep Sam Bradford on his feet. A WR in the second round could also help the Rams.
If elected, Lancman intends to enact legislation aimed at protecting the community affected by the environmental problems created by railroad companies that let their trains idle on the tracks outside the rail station.
Now a really exquisite Christmas has come and gone, spent mostly playing board games with my family and eating DELICIOUS food. I'm even taking half a loaf of homemade bread with me on the plane tomorrow! I feel like I'll be the most well-fed traveler there. No one else will have a loaf of bread on their lap with a contented smile on their face, I don't think.
Me: "... OK."
While I was getting ready to actually go to said Buddhist retreat, there were a lot of concerns flying around my head. What if I sleep through my alarm and never make it on the train? I don’t have anything to wear. They’re all going to be wearing hippie-Buddhist getups and things made of hemp. I’m going to be pointed out for the uncultured buffoon I am, wearing the same pair of jeans for 4 days. What if all the food (presumed vegan) just totally sucks, and they don’t feed me enough? What if they already know all these ultra secret Buddhist chants, and (again) I’m seen for the faker that I am? What if the whole thing is totally lame? These were predominant themes floating around my head at 6 in the morning as I left for my train. They were cemented by a group of 8 or so people I saw on my very train who were wearing floor length earth brown robes. They were most assuredly the real deal. I’m so screwed. Me, the phony. Everyone will know. But at this point I had to go through with it (those train things are tough to turn around), so I laid back in my seat and drank the thermos of scrumptious Brazilian natural-processed coffee I had made previously. Life, and my outlook on it, became instantly better. The morning was peaceful as we passed through foggy lush green fields in slow dawn, until the roads glittered in mid morning glow. This is the right thing to do, I nodded to myself as thoughts, contemplations, and memories were buzzing through my brain.
After a bit we went back to my room and my friend got me settled and then headed home. My husband had caught a flight out of CA that morning but still wouldn't be there until well into the afternoon. Around this time the phone calls started rolling in from the NICU nurses and doctors about all the diagnosis they were finding. What we thought was a healthy heart based on pre-natal screening actually had 4 holes in it, but they were small and expected to close on their own. Later that morning, another call came from the surgeon, he had convinced the hospital and some nurses to operate on Sunday. That was the next morning. I had someone wheel me to NICU and asked for a priest. Within an hour Father Scott from a nearby parish was there, and Tomas was baptized. Just him and me and a tiny syringe with a few drops of water. It was an emergency baptism - because he might not make it through the surgery.
Following Sunday’s riot at Cronulla beach – when local mobs had bashed people of Middle Eastern appearance – police confiscated iron bars and other weapons at Maroubra last night and blocked roads around the mosque. About 20 police cars surrounded the mosque, where four men showed their pistols and ammunition to a news crew, and boasted that others were carrying arms.
So who won the first Funny Rumble?
This Canvas has more techniques than I can share in one post so I am going to share one of the techniques I used in this canvas which you will find below these photos.
‘Why did you leave the golden throne resplendent with gems, why did you put aside the dazzling crown?
Frank: the military is part of the problem
Todays post is on one of the largest operators in Poland : Telekomunikacja Polska (Also know as Polish Telecom)
Last Saturday, Utusan Malaysia carried a front-page article headlined “Kristian agama rasmi?” (Christianity the official religion?).
Master suite; The drapes surrounding the bed create a focal point in the room.
The sex worker rights movements in the United States, Canada, Europe, Australia and New Zealand have been, for the last 40 years, very entangled with feminist movements. Though there is, certainly, a history of disagreement between feminists and supporters of sex workers’ rights, there are also many feminists who support the rights of sex workers.
But over the course of the game’s development, two particular systems became the source of concern: the Gems and Pandora systems. You can select up to three Gems, which allow you to customize certain attributes of your character, things like strength, defense and speed, etc. These Gems are divided into two categories, the “assist gems” which are always active and affect things like auto-blocking or auto tech-grabbing but cost meter to use, assist gems are ideally for people not to familiar to fighting games. “Boost gems” are the other type of Gems which affect your characters attributes, but require a certain game play condition(I.E. Hit X amount of times with special moves) before they activate for a certain amount time. In all honesty the gems aren’t really the game breaking system that they were thought out to be as they really only slightly tweak your character rather than drastically change them, you won’t lose or win a match simply because of the Gems you select. Unfortunately the method of which you edit Gems is rather clumsy as it’s in a separate menu which does take a lot of time, there was a recent patch that did make it so you can select Gems while in the character vs. screen though it still takes a fair amount of time.
The next year, by themselves, Mom and Dad drove out to British Columbia. In B.C., the province licences pulp and paper companies to cut trees. In return, they must provide and maintain camping sites. They do this by cutting a swath of trees down and leveling a road, in a loop. Every hundred yards or so, they hack out a square spot, and level it. Water and washrooms can be a mile away. Not exactly cheek by jowl with the nearest neighbor, but, at least the college kids don’t keep you awake with rap music all night.
Then I promptly sewed a slipcover for ONE of my EIGHT chairs. And though I loved how it turned out, I never finished the other seven. A year goes by, our family adopts a springer spaniel, said springer chews up the legs to my dining chairs (among other things), and the chairs get replaced without ever being recovered.
Oh and I just sat there with my strawberries and lost it. Just laughed and laughed and laughed until I couldn’t breathe. To think, that damn fish made everyone… EVERYONE…crazy today. One of our managers was so determined to find the fish, that he went around looking in empty tupperware bins, and trash cans – expecting to find the fish laying about half devoured by the idiot that brought the fish in the first place. But he never found it. The fish was gone, and it was delicious.
But where to start? How would we make it work? I suggested we do most of our research by phone, as I did for How Strong Women Pray. My telephone interviews with a governor, some CEOs, actors, sports figures, a college president, and others yielded great stories and information. I promised my intrepid co-author, though, that we could punctuate these conversations with a few visits in person to exciting and exotic places—all with reasonably priced airfares.
All we can do is decide the way we’re going to tell it. As a writer, it’s my job to make you want to watch what we’re about to show you. I try to think about what makes each story unique, and how best to highlight that to intrigue you. But between my typing fingers and your ears is a long, bumpy road.
We give this consideration when we’re gathering materials – we know that some combinations provide more play value than the sum of their parts. Fabric and clothes pins. Buttons and cups. Cardboard and a knife. Bringing materials that compliment each other doesn’t determine what they’ll become, but it increases the possibilities exponentially.
I honestly didnt know how to answer them.
For example, they boys like to play on the MacBook and iPad. I let them carry them over to the couch to get comfy. I admit I get a little nervous when I watch them walk with these expensive and fragile entertainment devices. After all, Drew is my spiller/dropper (he spills milk all the time – which I never cry over – and/or drops large portions of food on the floor) and Will is my bumper (he hits his feet, legs and head on inanimate objects all the time – a chip off the old block). So I keep imagining Drew simply dropping the iPad and Will tripping over something and the laptop flying against a wall.
where do you come from, I wont ever judge you,
Address: 1 Dargle Road, Lions River, KwaZulu-Natal, 3260
I've acquired an impressive array of Unfinished Objects (UFOs) throughout the past years. I've also managed to create a "To-Do/Want-To-Do" List that can probably never be completed in my lifetime. The existence of these things causes me some stress because I know they're just sitting there all unfinished, money having been spent to procure the supplies and a substantial investment of time already put into each UFO. But more and more projects landed at my feet, begging to be completed and thus relegating the UFOs to darker and dustier corners of the closet.
and my Blood is true drink.
may your life be fulfilling
The jungle crouched, humped in silence.
That is the question both we and Lurie must ask of him and nearer the end of the novel, when he begins to reckon himself it doesn't seem as if even that has been enough.
6). I am 6'4" and scared of heights
i am forever looking for awesome new places to snap pics — it can often be harder to find a sim to stage my “virtual photoshoots” on than it can be to figure out what to wear. there are lots of detailed && wonderful builds out there in the metaverse, but *finding* them can be a bit of a problem!
Whale Songs Heard Around New York City Waters – “For the first time in waters surrounding New York City, the beckoning calls of endangered fin, humpback and North Atlantic right whales have been recorded, according to experts from the Bioacoustics Research Program at the Cornell Lab of Ornithology and the New York State Department of Environmental Conservation (DEC).”
But you didn't stop.
The Bay Area Renaissance Festival at MOSI is located on Fowler Ave and 46th in Tampa across from the University of South Florida and parking is FREE.
2 c. Brussels Sprouts
I made this with filing wax cast into silver, and soldered a thin piece ring of silver to the top of it to set the stone in. I made the stone from a marbly sort of stone!
R. Et cum spiritu tuo.
The overall effect is a delicious wine offering lovely red fruit, that is silky and elegant with a pretty long richly raspberry finish – this is a lovely unassuming, enjoyable wine that would partner charcuterie and casserole to perfection. I think it showed the lovely attractive upfront 2008 style very well – 89/100 points.
Sometimes I feel like a female Larry David. That's a good thing. Yeah, I'm your Caucasian. (You have to be a Curb fan to get that.)
All is well in my world.
It's always a thrill when the artwork comes in on an illustrated book and especially when it's a re-telling, because you are both re-interpreting a story that preferably is already known to you.
Working with Sniff Seattle is fun, independent, satisfying and rewarding! Apply today. What could be better than strolling around Seattle with some of the best dogs in town?
When Kathryn receives this, it will be wrapped in cellophane (I didn't want to squash bunny with a lid).
Instead, Iain Dalton, the TUSC candidate explained the need to fight against the imposition of cuts and demand the funding needed in the city to provide decent quality services for all. Instead of the Labour/Green cuts of £90m this year and Labour’s £55m this year, he advocated building a mass campaign involving council workers, trade unions and service users to demand the funding required commenting on the missed opportunity that a fighting council could have used to start this when Eric Pickles visited Leeds a few months ago.
“If they call it ‘Spirit Airlines,’ where is their spirit?” he asked.
"Brides will enjoy the sounds of a harpist while wine tasting and menu sampling from the culinary team at Four Seasons and roaming models will provide a preview of the current season’s wedding gown trends. They will also have the opportunity to attend a variety of presentations from top wedding planners, acclaimed designers and celebrated photographers who will share their secrets for planning a successful and memorable event.
It is also a transgression that News Corp actually admitted to and apologised for this week. Parliament seems to be saying "thanks for the apology - now let's move on."
Jewelers use ultrasonic devices to remove foreign particles from gems and restore their sparkle. The ultrasonic waves of the SG-2000 thoroughly cleanse 150,000 pores of the skin, without the need of soap. This in turn helps with detoxification and aids the body's metabolism, leading to a beautification effect on the whole body, including firming and contouring. Skin becomes smoother, softer, and more resilient, and dead skin cells are eliminated. One week of continuous use will produce a thorough bodily cleansing.
I’m rather light-hearted about it, yes. And, it is quite serious. Many people are about to have their houses taken from them, not by high winds or floodwaters of New Orleans, but by their own investment choices. And then they will be in the rain. And they will complain and blame and some will call for rescue. All I am asking you is if you are willing to be ones of the ones in a position to help… at least to help a few of them.
Obama Says Same-Sex Marriage Should Be Legal: By publicly endorsing same-sex marriage in a television interview, the president took a definitive stand on one of the most contentious and politically charged social issues of the day…. – NYT, 5-9-12
I met Jesus in 1991, when I was 22 years old.
you’re sleeping
Sounds just short of tar and feathers for this Bird Brained bird egg burglar! Guess it could have been worse. Just imagine if all these birds had ganged up on this bozo!
Found me a tree with a view of your room.
Paper: Cherry Cobbler, Soft Suede, Old Olive, Very Vanilla
As we entered our respective circles, I imagine we were thinking the same thing: please let this whole ordeal be quick and painless and may no photographic evidence ever surface on the internet.
I freeze staring slack jawed at the door. The person in the stall begins to move around, hunting for toilet paper before she adds, "Calm down, you're freaking me out."
these today, looking a little closer at
I hope to see you tomorrow!!!
Have you ever wondered what would happen if your dead occult-obsessed brother came back to life in the attic of your new house and needed human flesh and blood in order to sustain himself and eventually return to his old self? Me too. This is Hellraiser.
All I can tell is brother you have to wait
What are you living for? And is it worth dying for? ( She said it better than that..;) )
Low - I don't really have a low this week.
I found a bargain.
So from now on, I will try my best to let God lead my life and I will only walk through the doors that He has opened for me… Can’t wait to see the next year of my life!!!
We're trying to go camping this weekend. We have two nights reserved with two families we love, and are hoping so hard that the patchy rain predicted this weekend is heavy on the dry and VERY light on the wet. Pray for us, won't you?! Add to that, this is Lucy's first time sleeping in a tent, so I am trying to prepare myself that she might not settle right away, and might not sleep through the night. Who even knows?! She might surprise us all!
Livvy was cracking us all up. She ate a million marshmallows and kept coming back to the bench "Nanny nanny? Where da cocolate?" She is such a great eater.. I keep thinking it'll rub off on Owen a bit.
“Then your horse will fall in love with you and do everything you say … kinda like a good woman,” Jake said, nodding to Hannah, who popped him on the seat of his pants. She led the way to the supper table without saying another word. Eli and Jake’s eyes danced with mischief. They were MacKennons and proud of it. The men were not highly educated, but they were extremely intelligent and intuitive. They spoke without the formal pronunciation that Hannah and her daughter Panther had received from years of study with Queen Titrimia and Sir Finnias Glowgold. Language skills were not Eli and Jake’s specialty, but equine expertise was well within their grasp, as was the ability to sculpt wood.
I take my hat off to your sense of balance, I really do, but I am not sure that fitting an entire family onto a single moped is the best form of transportation. We may be descended from apes, but most humans have lost the ability to grip one another like primates, which is what you seem to be expecting from the tiny naked children clinging to their parents as you swerve through the streets.
my non-pregnant body is so opposite the way it's been the last 9 months. my appetite is scarce, i have to force myself to eat so i can feel my little one. and of course i want chocolate more now than ever, and of course it's bad for your breastmilk. second to my child, magleby's chocolate cake is my most favorite thing and i may never forgive audra for that.
Apparently common sense is not applied to the work of translators …
many of my little treasures that I use to create these
I decided to do a my first video post on some model homes that another designer and I did a couple years ago..
Why darling, a cardigan for you!
4 crushed cardamom pods
Even though it was 25 years ago (July 23, 1983) most old timers at Air Canada and around the aviation community remember the details well. It all started with the discovery of a problem with part of the aircraft's flight management system. Basically that is a problem with the fuel gauges. It was a bad electrical connection, a faulty soldering joint.
Early this morning, as we turned the page to a new chapter, I awoke with a call to sweep the kitchen floor. It has a sense of parable about it, doesn't it? Rumi mentions it in at least one of his poems, and Christ Jesus mentions it a time or two, if I'm not mistaken. I would imagine it holds a place in many traditions, spiritual and otherwise. So, I swept out the old and, in doing so, I prepared for the new. Whatever that turns out to be.
I consider making a sarcastic remark but decide I haven't the energy. I replace sell sell sell with market market market though just to annoy Ted a bit.
I crossed The Bridge Over The River Rea (tremble as its raw power threatens to tear apart the culvert so it relentlessly hurtles down) and headed to The Old Library for banjista Nathan Bell. A one-man-band (bar one song), with foot-operated percussion and (at times) little bells dangling from the neck of his banjo. His was an excellent mix of the bluegrassy trad on some songs and the loopy wig-out on others, with a big Morricone-on-crack monstah finale. I must hear more of this Nate Bell character.
Whenever a tournament is about to begin and cricket forum begins to be a record in itself. Few matches have made this game was limited within the cricket new zealand australia but today the cricket new zealand australia 2005 is very different. The number of changes have taken place in upgrading rules and regulations formed, for playing the cricket new zealand australia to find out how their favorite team. There are few countries in sub continent that are recorded from these sources are accurate and give out information about their favorite cricketer in action on the cricket new zealand radio or information through the cricket new zealand australia for the cricket new zealand west of cricket player. Wallpaper gives a feeling of attachment to cricket lovers. These online games you need not worry. Cricket podcast downloading has also acted as a boon to cricket sites. Whatever the cricket new zealand australia or series.
This lends itself nicely to the paranoid notions of secret governments which many people seem to hold. There are plenty of conspiracy theories out there around powerful organisations who run things behind the scenes while we vote for what are essentially powerless figureheads. These societies include the likes of the Illuminati, the Freemasons, the Knights Templar, and others who are most definitely real in every possible sense.
Exemple: chocolate
These ladies I am writing I have discovered in the past year and their words on their blog, they minister to me. When I grow up I want to be like them. But lately I am stuck right where I am trying to get out. I know that it is God who will pull me out of this mess (with little to no help by me) but sometimes you just want someone wiser to come in and fix the whole mess that is your heart.
What is clear from the level of objections is that most people are opposed to this corporate development so near to residential houses. It is obvious to all that there will be a significant impact from light, noise and traffic nuisance to anybody living nearby. Common-sense says that it is simply unacceptable to put such a major development at the bottom of people’s gardens.
Over The Edge acknowledges the ongoing generous financial support of Galway City Council and The Arts Council.
Therefore I tell you, do not worry about your life, what you will eat or drink; or about your body, what you will wear. Is not life more important than food, and the body more important than clothes? (v25)
So, back to the drawing board. Another wedding in 2 weeks time and I have made the bride promise to put me next to a single man. One of the groom's fit climbing friends hopefully.
Hi I am Helen. I suffer with CFS/ME & found a few years ago I could no longer work due to my illness.
I let it soak into me, I let it move me and tonight I feel full of warmth.
5/26 – Toronto, ON @ Wrongbar
When the Murdoch hacking scandal broke in England the Wall Street Journal was reluctant to cover it just as Fox News was. This has been well covered by, for instance, NPR’s “On the Media” but PBS’s new Frontline, “Murdoch’s Scandal” provided a pithy summary of what happened. The Journal ignored the hugely important story the English paper The Guardian was breaking. The rest of the British press seemed afraid to join in the coverage. Then the New York Times joined in to pay attention to the scandal elevating its importance. The Wall Street Journal editorially criticized the Times for this. As Times got involved we saw an example of what has been called the “Times Effect” kicking in (there is probably also a PBS effect), the floodgates opened and it seemed every paper everywhere was jumping on the scandal except that the Wall Street Journal was still reluctant to report on it no matter its importance for American business.
This years event is set to include three plenary sessions and has provision for 120 presentations in parallel sessions focused on a wide array of topics, including energy supply and price forecasts, energy efficiency, climate change, renewable energy, and the interface of energy, environmental, and economic issues.
A Trick to Find Out An Inexplicable Phone Call
b. A 1920’s movie starring the first Native American lead actress in USA history
Poi Dog Pondering+
word is, Camilla doesn't like the job and doesn't like to live with Charles at Highgrove, but retreats to her own house 17 miles away, & has food sent over, from the kitchen chef at Highgrove.
Me: Yessir. Well, I should go. It is getting quite late and I have to go and wash my face and brush my teeth before bedtime. I love you Father. Pleasant dreams to you.
So when Paul gave his warning it was not an unbelievable thing. We would think that they should have heeded his admonition. Similarly we speak to the unbelievers giving them the gospel of God’s grace. We warn them of the wrath to come and it seems the natural thing for unbelievers to believe the vicarious death, burial and resurrection of Jesus Christ.
Bake at 350 degrees for 20 minutes.
**of course I would save my family above all of this.
“But I won’t last forever like you are. I’m human and will die sometimes.”
-- and attempt to galvanize them into maximum militancy.
Texas (San Antonio northeast to Austin, further northeast to Shreveport, Louisiana)
There is nothing in Scripture alone that explicitly authorizes Peter to do this. There are implications but nothing clear and unequivocal. That is because the Christians in the infant Church were NOT Sola Scriptura. But the Jews were.
Then some of those with us went to the tomb and found things just as the women had described, but him they did not see.”
Skinny Foods site is dedicated to single serving portions for those of you without an army to feed. I obviously had to double this recipe. They didn't last long between school snacks and me grabbing a couple every day to take with me on my adventures. Next time I will make even more as they keep well in an airtight container in the refrigerator.
Although the book reaches no fixed conclusion other than that, it explores the contours of that paradigm. Brooks writes in a relaxed informal style, which again feels almost old fashioned. A writer with ideas he wants to share. How quaint. Nor do you have to agree with everything he says, or accept everything he claims, but at least in this book, you’re going to understand his argument well enough to feel confident of negotiating your way through it.
By this time the sun had a watery look to it and we repaired back to Bruno’s, opened a bottle of wine (we have three cases in the car) and spent a most pleasant afernoon reading. Anna battling through Jean M. Aeul’s latest and me with Michael Connelly.
I’m a fan of a solidly made Western movie, as you’ll see in the coming days, and Silverado is a fairly .. well, it’s alright. It’s got a huge, talented cast that clearly enjoyed making the picture. However, the writing at times seems to be full of itself, like it’s trying to be all deep ‘n shit when all we want is cowboys shootin’ shit. So to speak. The conversations between Paden (Kevin Kline) and Stella (Linda Hunt) seem to hint at a long forgotten past between the two of them, but it’s mostly just air. Then there are the storylines that start and stop abruptly, as if no one would believe Paden would get together with Hannah (Rosanna Arquette) so they just picked one of the other dudes that wasn’t the black one.
Here is a glance of what you might find in your Rack Jr.
Does anyone "faux" anything anymore?
Does my family listen to secular music? Sure we do. Lots of it. We just don't listen to trash.
and the hum
But it was only going to be a matter of time before some fool hack decided that not daring to show the ring of stars was "eurosceptic". It really is true ... these people haven't got any brains.
I really am thrilled that it was so much fun and just a great weekend of learning. It's always a little hard to come home after the adrenaline of the weekend wears off, but it was great to see my baby girl, who I just adore beyond words.
Budget Cut for Fence on U.S.-Mexico Border
Mrs Miggins: “Oh dear – stage 3 already you say! How long have I got…?”
MP3 download only $69.
I’m not saying that I’m right and the Don’t- eat- that,- it’s- haraam’ brigade are wrong, but I’m simply saying, allow me to eat that which I have no doubt in and you stay away from what is doubtful for you.
Serious writers seek to become excellent writers.
1 cultivating
and written their own poetry.
This blog is not authorized, endorsed, approved, prepared or affiliated by any persons involved in the making or ownership of the Avengers movie or comic books. The views and opinions expressed in this blog are strictly those of the author and do not in any way reflect Marvel Comics, Marvel Studios, Paramount Pictures or Walt Disney Pictures.
Genera: Science Fiction
I created these card fronts after taking a brayer class with fellow PhillyInker Juliana Bibas. She taught us how to use the brayer to create great scenes with Classic Stampin' Up inks, our brayer and sponges!!
Finally we've been blessed by mother nature with sunshine and warm temperatures this past week and over the weekend. Prior to this fair weather stretch we've had nothing but rain, rain and more rain with the odd sunny day.
All of which means that the actual message of the ad is “I had a job in the auto industry until about six years ago… and then I got a new job. Which is apparently one with a bad environmental and fiscal record, but that doesn’t matter! That’s because Barack Obama really, really needs me to get on the screen and tell you how great it is for me as a spectator to see the auto industry get bailed out. So I figure that I’m golden… oh, crud, Facebook. But… they promised me that Republicans couldn’t read!”
Each pill contained 25 mg of ephedrine, 200 mg of caffeine and 80 mg of aspirin. The caffeine alone in each pill is equivalent to nearly a 6-pack of Coca-Cola.
I organized this post for people who were already fans of “The Walking Dead”, and therefore skipped over basic background information. I engaged the audience with questions after each section and was genuinely interested in their responses. I needed to add some pictures or videos in order to make the post more visually appealing, but I initially structured it in such a way that it was not necessary. I liked writing a post that wasn’t solely about summarizing a show or introducing a show to the audience. I should have engaged the audience more in all of my posts instead of just this one.
Idea #1: Teach about the Word of Wisdom by playing a scripture scavenger hunt for some of the foods that are good for us to eat. Teach the children how to use the Topical Guide in the Bible. Show how to find words alphabetically and how to read the scripture references; then locate that scripture. Practice with the word food. Read several of the references and choose D&C 89:16 to locate. Have the children read it aloud as a choral reading. Review the promised blessings of obeying the Word of Wisdom by reading with them D&C 89:18–21.
Sheffield was world famous for steel and the fine cutlery made there. When it lost its industrial base much of its identity went with it but instead of creating something to be proud of, something to invigorate the lives of its dejected working people, the local council have made it look hideous and, rather than make people feel at home, they are repelled. Locals people feel rejected by their physical environment.
I no longer buy lots of gifts for neices/nephews as they are all getting older, so I get them gift cards from places I know they love and give them at Xmas. I was making some of these gift card holders to hang on my tree the other day and thought...hmm maybe others would like to make some too so I have done up a quick tutorial for you all.
My New Years prayer is this:
You can transfer your favorite music and play it in the background while reading.
The UK based charity, Jubilee Campaign, reports that they know of over 900 cases of human sacrifice in the country. Churches are singing a song: "Heal our land, end child sacrifice." A BBC undercover reporter filmed a local witch doctor who explained how the sacrifice of a child is "the most powerful spell". The witch doctor was recorded saying: "there are two ways of doing this, we can bury the child alive on your construction site, or we can cut him in different places and put the blood in the bottle of spiritual medicine."
My work was paired with that of a silk painter and I thought it was a great compliment.
What have you people been doing since September? I barely know what I'm doing but apparently I am doing a better job than most of them with my limited knowledge and skills. I'm not even saying that I don't have my own problems. Hell I think I having more problems then the other teams. I break my own security measures at least once a week minimum. I'm planning on making a huge series of "Y U NO"'s by the end of this. I'm not even trying to say that I am better than them. I know that I am an idiot, it's just who I am. Half the time I can't even explain what I am actually doing, I just know how to do it in my own backwards way. Of course I do at least make sure to comment the flip out of everything (programmers will understand). The only thing I can say I am is what the team leader told me I was ; Driven.
02. Sull´Amaca (02:04)
I remember most of the ride home, and getting home and going to bed.
A reading nook or lounging area is a must in my book. Kid's LOVE tight little cozy spaces. Unfortunately, the room I'm working with doesn't have a closet or you'd better believe I'd whip that into a nook in 2 seconds! I'll make something work, even if it's just some plush pillows in a corner with a light and some shelves will do but boy is that teepee calling to me! Does a teepee qualify as a reading nook?
Y'see the aim of the impending Tobacco Display ban is not about protecting young people from the clutches of tobacco advertising. It is about further public humiliation of lifelong smokers who will not quit and clear the way for this new socially engineered vision of Tobacco Control, backed by its uncharitable "charity" front groups.
1 enlargements
Heres a few challenges;
The idiom definition for the phrase says to have loose lips means to have a big mouth, susceptible to talking about everything and everyone.
What drove the police to fire tear gas and water cannons on the protesters despite the crowd’s intention to disperse already?
Now before you go, I suggest you check out the International Food Blogger Conference that is happening in August. I love this conference and will be speaking there too. I will be posting more soon but here is a little preview,
It is a long programme – I would recommend watching the first half of it. I warn you now it gets really disgusting (DO NOT EAT WHILE WATCHING! – I made that mistake when I watched it!)
10 band assisted pull ups
June is going to be a FABULOUS month. Yes, I graduate from pharmacy school June 11th, but why stop there at making June fabulous? I look at June 12th as my rebirth back into the social world that I once relished in. Hard to believe I am a social butterfly, isn't it?
It’s also important to remember cooking here is considered ‘women’s work’. During our first year here, my neighbours only came to our BBQs to laugh at my emasculated husband rushing about grilling and serving meat.
Review by Juliana Glanfield
But as with so many other divination systems, the reason I believe astrology isn’t an official tool of the U.S. Government (as far as we know), is that it merely gives you a map of possibilities and influences… you have to take action to make things work. Whether your woo tool of choice is astrology, Tarot readings, fortune cookies, manifesting, channeling/spirit mediums, rune stones, tea leaves or pick up sticks, you have to DO something with the information you’re given… and then you have to have the patience to keep on the path until you reach your goals. Even the immensely popular manifesting book
the service of two power generating sets, N140 Million approved, and
7. How to Enter. Participants may enter as follows:
~ Magic and the supernatural as coping mechanisms for individuals and societies
This rate’s former all-time low was 3.11%, registering on April 12.
The kayak was not the important thing, though … it was the exhilarating feeling of a fear overcome. It’s still not my preference to be in the deep water. But I learned that, sometimes, the deepest water can bring the greatest joy.
Naturally, I thought of all my blogger friends who are stay at home writers, either by choice or circumstance, or those like me struggling to make ends meet and needing just.that.little.bit.more. I discovered this site through kpwriting.com; but once you spend the couple hours filling out the in-depth application, then submitting a writing sample of the company’s choosing, you get to pick from a number of writing job orders, your login and order search all happens at academia research.. A WHOLE LOT OF the orders at this site are academic, college level research papers, dissertations, and more often than not, on subjects that any geek/nerd would already have a vast knowledge/resource base to draw upon. There are even some orders that are nothing more than power point presentations.
We asked Pangea author Mary Farquharson to talk about how she juggles her double life as a writer and a producer.
The main part of the evening and the most awe inspiring was most certainly the Fashion Show. Needless to say Jawaher outdid themselves beyond my expectations. The attention to detail on almost every part of the Abayas and the intricate patterns and Crystals which were not only adorned onto some of the pieces but also in some cases woven and embellished within the garment, left every woman spellbound in the audience. The simplicity of the flow of the Abaya’s as well as the elegance which oozed from the detail kept everyone talking, no one could decide which one appealed more, as with each garment that came onto the catwalk, it seemed to outdo the previous piece even more, I was in true Abaya heaven!
peek at the time
The blond girl thought of the young gypsy boy who’d helped her free a rock from the ground, and of the teenager who had been her first kiss, and finally of the man who now filled her nights. She blushed a little, but said “Oh yes. Very much.”
I will share the "recipe" with you--however I put "recipe" in quotes because I never really "follow" recipes.
Now for the final day we have to write about how we balance knitting and crochet. The short answer is I don’t! I do whatever the whim takes me and what pattern I fancy doing next. At the moment that tends to be crochet as it lends itself more to the wire jewellery that I am currently doing. However, to be fair I did a comparison table:
Here are my Fab Friend Posters. Click on image to download in google docs. (this was my first time using google docs so I hope it works - fingers crossed)
what always happens in the ebbs of ne’er-yet-to-flower love.
German and US carmakers gained 1.7 percentage points and 1.5 percentage points, respectively, in market share last month at the expense of Chinese and Japanese brands, according to CAAM’s statement today. Volkswagen (VOW)’s Passat sedan was the top- …
And finally, speaking of evangelisation, we had the lovely students from St Patrick’s Evangelisation School with us all day on Friday in the parish. We spent the morning looking at the topic of vocation (I focussed on the lay vocation, in particular Christifidelis Laici, while Fr James focussed on the priestly vocation, and how as lay people we can encourage priestly vocations), and after lunch we enjoyed the countryside (Wandsworth Common is pretty rural when you live in Soho) and suitably finished up having a drink in a pub called The Hope! An excellent group of young people who are coming close to the end of their year of formation… To find out more about them, see here.
In my dictator project I was assigned Lenin the russian dectator, so when Pablo Tello wrot on the board who got what dictator instead of writing it correctly, he wrote Juan Felipe Zuleta—Lenon. Therefore My project started with a slide with a picture of Jonh Lenon then sorry Lenin. Then I went on and with vivid detail te life of Vladimir Ilch Ulianov or Lenin. For spanish I did my project on secret societies. I talked avout what people speculate about them and what we know for sure about them. Then based on the fects we got our own conclussions on them. At last at the Carta de Jamaica we had to make a summary. I went so deep in it and wrote a 3 or 4 page summary about it.
During the second intermission, the presenter announced a giveaway called 'Dance for your dinner', during which people could stand up in the aisle, dance to the music, and the winner would be given a $50 gift certificate to a local restaurant. As several young people began to dance, Fred observing them, stood up, removed his jacket and shuffled to the aisle a few seats away. As the music blared, this small, elfin figure lifted his arms and began to dance, unabashedly and unashamedly. Then he looked over at me and gestured for me to join him. I smiled and shook my head, but this didn't deter him. He waved at me again, using a broader, more expansive movement. Twenty seconds later, there we were, Fred and I dancing in the aisle together. Beaming at me, he echoed the sign I had made at him earlier, raising his hand in a prolonged thumbs up. My small embarrassment disappeared completely and I just gave myself in to the moment.
Fornäs, Johan (1985) Tältprojektet: Musikteater som manifestation (The Tent project. Music theatre as manifestation) Stockholm/Göteborg: Symposion.
The Seventh Veil
"Although the Met Office correctly predicted that last Saturday and Sunday would be perfect beach weather for the South Coast, they wrongly envisaged thundery showers for the bank holiday Monday.
It was reported yesterday on one of the newsgroups I subscribe to the a contributor had thoroughly enjoyed a cask conditioned pint of BrewDog IPA (sic) at an unknown Wetherspoon outlet in Manchester.
for more follow the link..
A roast dinner on a Sunday (or any other day of the week for that matter - it's too good for just a weekend!) is one of my favourite things in the entire world, and a good bit of roast Lamb is the best Sunday roast of all. I try and do one every week (although I refuse to submit to the emotional blackmail that a certain instant gravy company that shall (*sniff* ahhh) remain nameless insist on putting in it's adverts that your family will fall apart if you don't make a roast once a week, and presumably be taken into care, your neighbours will whisper behind your back and you will become an alcoholic and die and be buried in a pauper's grave - or am I taking this a bit far?)
2. Toss it in the air.
He felt the walls, up and down, and found more holes like the one he had crawled out of. Four holes, and now he didn’t know from which one he had crawled. They seemed identical enough that he could have been in any.
He is messianic and gives them a sense of purpose and mission, though one of them says they should really recreate Shackleton's expedition, because it ended in failure, and they know all about failure. The affection between them and the way they care for each other was nice. I wish I had fellow jobless mates to hang out with & lift each others' morale.
Although Zemlinsky was associated with some of the most influential and talented musicians and artists of his generation, he kept no diary, left no memoirs and remained nonchalant about correcting biographical errors that appeared in print while he was alive. Alban Berg, a composer strongly drawn to Zemlinsky and his music and who recognized the value of Zemlinsky’s contributions, once considered undertaking a biography about him, but sadly he died and the work never materialized. Had Berg’s plan come to fruition, it might well have bolstered Zemlinsky’s reputation, particularly toward the end of his life and in the immediate years that followed. At the very least, Berg’s efforts would have provided valuable information for future scholars. As it is, there are gaps in Zemlinsky’s life that are unlikely ever to be filled.
2 Chronicles 7:14 If my people who are called by My name will humble themselves and pray and seek My face, and turn from their wicked ways, then I will hear from heaven, and will forgive their sin and heal their land.
“Stop lying, Mark Gartrell! I’ve known you long enough.”
go do
2nd name submitted: Karlovy Vary (approved)
Mr. Chang: Hu Jintao just a couple of weeks ago issued a public warning to generals and admirals reminding them that they’re subservient to the CCP. Now, is that something you do if you take the loyalty of the flag officers for granted? You don’t have coup rumors in stable governments. When’s the last time you heard talk of a military takeover in Canada?
Let the house of Israel say,
I feel like the options were endless! But, since I needed a birthday card for my brother-in-law for this upcoming week, I decided to use The Open Sea and the Nautical Expedition DSP. (This paper is on the Clearance Rack which you can see right here!)
While I cannot say I have found closure, I know that I'm on the right path. I have let go of the anger that has kept me from healing...but most importantly I have given up on believing the person I have known all these years is still there. War is a hard thing. It's hard on the economy, it's hard on the soldiers, and it's hard on the families. Most importantly it is hard on the minds of everyone involved. Some people go to war, and come home CLOSE to the same person they left, some leave and come home completely different. Regardless, no one comes home exactly the same.
Not that we didn’t have fun with the gum; we were buying so many pieces trying to get those rare stickers, we’d end up with a tonne of the stuff. At one point, we had a contest to see how many pieces we could fit in our mouths. I’m man enough to admit that I won, with 23 pieces. When I finally spat it out, it looked like a tennis ball-sized brain.
Anyway, here's a sneaky peek at my project and I hope you hop over to the DT blog to look at the whole thing. I'm quite chuffed with it and think it might end up in one of my Granddaughters' bedrooms which of course, means I'll have to make another one, lol!
…and it requires more than a post by a dime-store counselor!
Me: "Excuse me, we are here to donate blood for my friend. She is in room 805."
I begin to see that he is carrying me and my kicking and screaming have only made him hold on tighter. I begin to see that he won't let us go no matter how much others may abandon or try to hurt us.
cream card
generous grating nutmeg
Speaking of YouTube… (I have one segue, people. Take what you can get. Or leave me segue suggestions in the comments.) I can’t quite remember how I came across this. The most likely candidates are Twitter (I follow strange and wonderful people) and the suggestion sidebar on YouTube (I watch strange and wonderful things on YouTube). Either way, this is definitely in the running to greatest/weirdest thing on YouTube that doesn’t involve a cat:
So – how can us mere mortals take advantage of a multi-billion dollar space navigation system just with our simple Arduino? Easy – with an inexpensive GPS receiver and shield. When searching for some hardware to use, I took the easy way out and ordered the Sparkfun GPS pack which includes the required Arduino shield and header sockets, short connecting cable and an EM-406A 20-channel GPS receiver with in-built antenna:
Off the stage, dance teachers, parents, friends, and dancers who are not competing on that day are trying to win another title: best dressed. You will see everything from the strictest business attire to dresses appropriate for a semi-formal dance, from tennis shoes to sky-high pumps. The range is amazing, but everyone looks fabulous.
"We will close the tax gap, our customers will feel that the
Get it? Got it? Good.
Passing by the bad/I felt sorry for the man doing “foot run’
Conveniently for him, President Obama only talks about the last level of tax, the 15 percent portion, leaving out the rest. He only wants to talk about the last toll paid, not the total, and that’s how he makes his disingenuous argument…
#23. Thankful for Starbucks. YUM! White chocolate mocha no whip, please!
Rating: Nine of Ten Stars
There were sly jokes and comments that I would have never caught as a teen, that I caught and adored. I had a new love for the material because I’ve spent time in New Orleans and it is my favorite city. I had a special sympathy for Blanche and Stella as a woman who went through my own personal pains. I especially felt for Blanche in a new way, because I saw a radiant woman I love dearly unravel in mental illness.
Taken from 'The Fame' (released January 2009)
The startled passenger said “I didn’t mean to frighten you, just wanted to ask you something.”
Another reform I would make would be to stop graduating students from high school after they complete 12th grade. Instead, I think the various levels in school should be:
So since the blind clinical trial crashed and burned, this time around I'm calling the shots. This week, I went back to a medication I've used before called Voriconazole. We know it works, so I'm taking it as a buffer for a month and then I will start a new medicine.
I've had Hereafter on my bookshelf for a pretty long time. I wasn't planning on reading it for a while and by that I mean a very long time. But then, I had an urge to read something ghostly and so Hereafter it was. Now, I just regret not reading this sooner!
The present government is going to win all its arguments in both the House and the Senate any way. They have the numbers on their side. I would think that they would like to look good while they’re doing it.
In this place I would say a plain word or two to those who understand the method of justification by faith which is in Christ Jesus, but whose trouble is that they cannot cease from sin. We can never be happy, restful, or spiritually healthy till we become holy. We must be rid of sin; but how is the riddance to be wrought? This is the life-or-death question of many. The old nature is very strong, and they have tried to curb and tame it; but it will not be subdued, and they find themselves, though anxious to be better, if anything growing worse than before. The heart is so hard, the will is so obstinate, the passions are so furious, the thoughts are so volatile, the imagination is so ungovernable, the desires are so wild, that the man feels that he has a den of wild beasts within him, which will eat him up sooner than be ruled by him. We may say of our fallen nature what the Lord said to Job concerning Leviathan: “Wilt thou play with him as with a bird? or wilt thou bind him for thy maidens?” A man might as well hope to hold the north wind in the hollow of his hand as expect to control by his own strength those boisterous powers which dwell within his fallen nature. This is a greater feat than any of the fabled labours of Hercules: God is wanted here.
“PRs in singapore are treated almost like a Singaporeans or even better. And they have this additional benefit which is they could simply convert the currency they earned in Singapore and buy a CONDO or land in their homeland…FYI, i have a fellow grassroots leader who is a PR and he told us that he would go back to INDIA one day and he has no intention to take up citizenship. YUCKS.”
Saturn birth jeans misfortune
This works beautifully with blog buttons, as they all tend to be made pretty much the same size (a little smaller than the average sidebar, ie: 180px - 220px, depending on the template). But what if you are putting odd sizes in your marquee? Some very narrow... and you want to put some text or a caption underneath (say, blog awards or cards and tags)...
I got the itch to clean out my pantry the other day. I had a huge container of peanut butter from Costco that I rarely eat except for the occasional spoonful before bed (What? You don't eat peanut butter by the spoonful?). I also had partially used bags/containers of craisins, white chocolate chips, and oatmeal. I'm happy to say that I made a little more room in my pantry, and I got some delicious oatmeal bars as a result of my "hard" work.
Though logic knows that this will NEVER end. That there will always be the presence of this most torturous grief.
I had an amazingly screwed up childhood.
While the kids performed triple unders and booty bounces, we jumped a fabulous routine to Batman music. With ropes behind our backs, like capes, we ran onto the center of the gym floor. Every time the music said the word, "Batman," we jumped twice. Life got tough when hearing, "Batman, Batman, Batman." That's six jumps which had us bent over and puffing. Our finale topped all when we tossed our ropes in the air and missed catching them.
William Wallace: “Earlier, Settele had asked his colleague at the Sapienza, Benedetto Olivieri—who was professor of Old Testament there but also happened to be Commissary of the Holy Office, the branch of the papacy that had condemned Galileo—whether he could openly teach the earth’s motion without running into difficulty with the Church.” (The Modeling of Nature, p. 394).
I too, found the “No” document mentioned in Pugh off-putting, just because it set up exclusive attitudes from the beginning and reinforced stereotypes of archives and rare book rooms. While I don’t like the idea of having patrons photocopy their own materials, I am beginning to support more liberal alternatives for photocopying within reason and capability. We tend to operate under ‘fair use’ policies for photocopying under copyright, but oblige patrons more recently with use of digital cameras and options for scanning materials. I just think patrons need respectful reminders about the policies concerning preservation.
Douglas MacMillan Cherry, 38, Maplewood, N.J.
Furthermore, the faculty hosts institutes for the study of the Dead Sea Scrolls (Qumran), Christian Cultural Heritage and the Institute of Indian Studies. Teaching takes place in a historic building in the centre of the city, close to the University Library and town facilities. The faculty has a very active student society which organises many social activities.
If you’re an author or illustrator who’s blogging, Tweeting, Facebooking or using other social networks to build your platform, you need to think strategically about who you’re going to reach online and how you’re going to do it.
Recently, I tweeted that all information literacy programmes should contain a section called, precisely, ‘Haterz gonna hate’. The term ‘haterz’ is useful because it draws attention to how a new language – symbolised in the use of the suffix ‘z’ – reflects a relatively new phenomenon: ever since anyone with a computer and a net connection could publish their thoughts and feelings, we’ve had haterz.
Joy Division
Happy Thursday! everyone and I hope today will bring you more happiness and creativity to create something awesome and as for me, I am still doing my canvas and having loads of fun with paints, texture paste, medium gel, pumice gel, fabrics, papers, stamping, bees wax, doodling, stencilling and everything in between. Our swap group have just confirmed that the canvas swap among us will be on the May 12th I have another 2 weeks plus to create more canvas.
“Hm... Ok. Try the next one. If it's the man with the swept over hair you'll definitely get it from him.”
At this year’s BOMA International Conference, nurturing the next generation of commercial real estate professionals was a big topic of discussion. Our internship program is a step in that direction. What’s your property or company doing to pave the way for young people to work in commercial real estate? Your thoughts and ideas may inspire others, so please share.
The US wants Israel to wait, and what this constant drip of stories indicates is a sense in Washington that its efforts to convince Israel to do so are failing.
But what she told me next was chilling indeed. She had a dream last night. She dreamed the government seized our house and took all of our food. Not bad guys, not the bogey man, not the characters in most kids' worst nightmares, but our government.
Sooooo.....
Today: Same as yesterday
Gary J. Frank, 35, South Amboy, N.J.
After a lifetime spent with literature, this seems natural and ordinary to me: I remember my young distress with some amusement. Of course no one cares about the "real" Hamlet, or the "real" Macbeth, or the "real" King Lear. What matters is what Shakespeare did with them. What matters is the poetry.
Quotation and photograph from The Gardens of Provence and the French Riviera by Michel Racine, Ernest J-P Boursier-Mougenot and Françoise Binet. The MIT Press, 1987.
Yippee, my Mom is out of the hospital!! Finally after 9 weeks, she is now in rehab hospital and she is doing fine :D. I finally got some time for crafting woohoo!!
When one considers this was written in 1870, then the author's prescience is as mystifying as it is astounding. The protagonist is one Tom Hill, a huntsman, who gets split up from the rest of the hunt, and encounters an old, grey fox. As the title suggests, he's rather a prophetic one, too:
So: the original Poseidon Adventure, an inspirational, emotionally affecting suspense picture. Now let’s look at Poseidon. As we know from Das Boot and A Perfect Storm, Wolfgang Peterson is an expert at photographing sinking tubs and the people who drown in them. Unlike those more successful, earlier outings however, this time Peterson forgot to put any people on the boat. If you made a silent movie about rats trapped in an upside down model sailboat (say, Stuart Little’s) and the rats managed to scramble somehow to the top of the boat, the results would be exactly like Poseidon. It is as though Petersen decided to take the last five minutes of A Perfect Storm and expand it to two hours. It may very well be that Petersen has done his science homework and a capsized ocean liner only has minutes before it goes down. That would be all very well and good in a documentary. But a fiction film needs air pockets if we’re to form any attachment to the characters…and we ought to form attachments to the characters if the film is going to have any meaning…and a film should have meaning, shouldn’t it? Poseidon is a large screen video game, less important to us than the accompanying popcorn. We neither know nor care anything about the little band of anonymous ciphers who inhabit this story beyond their names and occupational and familial titles. They are no more important to us than the hundreds of extras who are ritually drowned, crushed, shattered, burned and electrocuted in this mildly violent ballet of death.
This is called an El Maley Rachamim. This is a prayer for John’s soul. And we express our presence to you, Myles, to you Anna, Peter, and all who love and cherish his life, and now his memory. You will hear his name in Hebrew; you’ll hear his name as Yohannan Meir Ben Menachem Mendel, which is a fancy way of saying we love him.
I did not have to wear a suit for a business lunch but I did have to pull myself out of my pajamas to meet a friend for a casual walk through Target.
And the pigs and the goats
until the bar owner sued the church on the grounds
If you've ever encountered one of those geeks who insists upon installing Linux on everything from his new iPhone to a BetaMax he found at a thrift store, this title should elicit a laugh. Unfortunately the actual book doesn't live up to the promise of the title.
For travelers: What information would you like to improve the likelihood that you might seek out indigenous tourism offerings?
But America’s ombudsmen(voters) political choices in America’s House of Representatives has made the above idea quite unlikely to grow in the neocon House of Representatives. Neocons are not likely to favor something their political base opposes. So, the ball is likely back in the America’s consumers court.
Chelveston or Raunds or Keyston
Now, start rolling from the shorter side. You should roll it away from you, with out the foil. Take the help of the foil to lift the dough and to aid in rolling.
PASOK and New Democracy are promising all the things they have not managed to accomplish since World War II.
It seems to me that many in the unschooling community are hesitant to criticize themselves, which is understandable. However, I think that, in order for our movement to remain a viable and vital one, we much undergo a nearly constant process of self-evaluation and self-criticism as a means for growth. Because of this, I’ll cite a real and omnipresent ‘con’ that I’m struggling with in regards to unschooling.
4) Tear-out shopping lists are in the front of each month’s section. I use these not just for shopping lists but for any other little notes I may need to jot down.
The arbiter reminded him that time was running out, to which the student replied that he had several extremely relevant answers, but couldn't make up his mind which to use.
Time moved slowly as Gladys watched the clock and paid little attention to her SRA workbook. Heck she couldn’t even concentrate when it was reading time. Finally the bell rang for lunch and the whole class buzzed with excitement. They uncharacteristically lined up quietly for lunch. They walking in a straight line, not pushing or shoving, but politely and reverently toward the cafeteria. Gladys spotted Mrs. Wells, one of the room mothers, unloading cupcakes and balloons from the back of her station wagon. Gladys tingled with excitement.
hearts, rending agony
Caldwell, as is typical, began by citing his belief in Jesus Christ and his history in military service. The latter, he said, was a vision of diversity, while Brooklyn has had a segregated economy.
in its cage.
2 museum
I hung up the phone, and . . . . . .
We only stayed that way for a second, when banging in the kitchen brought us back to our senses. I got up and wandered in to talk to Gram, Mr. T coming a minute later.
I got on the bus, listening to my music, and then about 10 minutes later, we got to this massive traffic jam! So annoying! It took us nearly 10 minutes to get through. Then I missed the second bus that I normally get, had to get on another one that I’ve never got on before, and only just made it to school.
I promised myself a full 2 weeks of no wine and clean eating. i think if i can’t make it 2 weeks without a glass of wine – i have some serious issues.
Each story features our heroine, C.J. Mills, as she begins work for a Los Angeles company called ‘The Honey Trap‘ – used by jealous spouses to catch their cheating partners in the act. It’s C.J.’s job to seduce, and screw, her hapless target, proving to the client that they can’t be trusted.
***Coming soon***
Another feature I felt very intensely is a ‘sloppily introduced feminism’ in tango. Experienced dancers know very well that the role of the woman in tango is extremely important and that she controls in a great extent the dance. But she has to know how to follow and when to ‘take over’ the situation. This requires skill, talent and experience on her behalf, but once she masters the game she can be the ‘real’ leader. Nevertheless she cannot lead and this is perceived falsely by many women as submissiveness. Always a discussion starts by somebody opening it and that doesn’t mean that he is the ruler.
We must remember the Good Part is on the inside and even though it manifests in all types of cuteness and swagger on the outside...the Good Part remains on the inside of all of us...
Well, most of them can...
Anwaar: So we shall be searched?
Now for the letters. Just a semi-quick mailbag this week, but a couple doozies…
I finally got the last (or next to the last, because I am not counting the box of wipes and diapers that for some strange reason was in our surface shipment) box unpacked. It is nice to have everything put away, even if it is in a place that I do not want it. For example, there is no linen closet in the house. So I have linens in Sam’s closet and in my closet. I really would like them all together, and preferably not in my room, but sometimes you get what you get. Today we get small closets and not much storage. It’s good that we didn’t bring all of our junk, I mean, that I got rid of all our junk.
Am One Who offers peace when you are overwhelmed.
was little coverage of the beatings and arrests leading up to the
I also wanted to share my kid's craft closet. with you. I love finding storage solutions that really "work" and putting all of our daughter's art supplies and small toys into these clear bins has been a lifesaver for us!
4. Raise my boys in the most loving, nurturing environment so the grow to be healthy, capable, independent, and RESPECTFUL children and young men.
But there is a light at the end of the tunnel!!!! This weekend I determined to potty train my 3 year old boy. We've worked with him before but never very consistently and it was more up to him. I'd offer the potty but never forced it. This weekend I put him in underwear and we went to town! He has now had big boy "panties" (yes all three of my boys call them panties) on since Friday morning including at night and is officially a big boy!! We only had one or two accidents and never at night. I'm super proud of my little guy!
The initial concern of these authors is contamination of their own laboratory experiments but, alas, it is not only laboratories that can be contaminated with retroviruses that were “engineered in the 1980s”, many members of the international public could have met with a similar contaminatory fate.
But such concerns were already being addressed. A volunteer team of doctors descended on the camp last week to give flu shots and prevent other infections from spreading and protesters had set up their own internal monitoring systems to prevent sexual assault and other violence.
Saturday, k had his Alumni Crawfish Boil event at the school. I volunteered to work the registration table with people from his office (Actually, let me clarify. K volun-told me to work the registration table. Thanks k!), and I stood in the 95 degree sun for 3 hours and ended up getting burnt to a crisp. Only on the backs of my legs. In the knee-pits. Wonderful.
Thank God for gracious friends!
“It is likely that employers and staffing firms will compete heavily to source qualified candidates,” according to the release. “However, each location will experience varying degrees of difficulty. For example, Seattle’s talent pool is smaller than average, with just eight potential candidates per advertised job in July. In comparison, the talent pool in New York consists of 16 candidates per job, larger than the national average.”
Beneficiary: Fundación IRSICAIXA
For a small, locally owned and family operated company like Power House, such news can be intimidating given the perceived costs of historic construction, but Power House, which also happens to be female and minority owned, exceeded the Historic Commission’s expectations, and for that, the company will receive two grand jury awards at thePreservation Alliance for Greater Philadelphia’s Preservation Achievement Awards luncheon this May.
and we all know things arent the way they appear
The following several photographs show a set assembled on a large table near a window with northern light exposure, as this has become my favorite method of photographing, even though I have studio flash lighting equipment.
Emi is 8 months old tomorrow. I could say "where does the time go?" but you're tired of hearing that. She is crawling around like a crazy baby. One minute she's right there, the next she is in the bathroom because she heard the bath water running (loves her bath!). We finally bought her a dresser this weekend. She still lives in the closet but at least now she has a proper place for her clothes. Those 3 drawer clear Rubbermaid bins only last so long. She has 3 teeth and 1 on the way. Only 4,286 more teeth to go. I jest...
So, I am trying to revise my feeding methods now by giving him more liberty to do few things on his own. Yesterday, I let him peel the egg shells and the look on his face after discovering what was inside made me literally smile to ears. He has been helping me with setting the table for quite some time now but helping mom in loading the dishwasher is a recent addition to the "allowed" items, thus, a great motivation to finish the food on the plate without having the parents to struggle over.
One, what exactly is an “Allod”, anyway? It turns out that an Allod is a chunk of habitable terrain floating around in this sort of… space… Etherium-like… thing. (The Etherium is Treasure Planet’s “outer space”… which is a strange sort of space with breathable atmosphere and unidirectional gravity… unless there’s a spatial distortion or baby black hole. Treasure Planet isn’t a terrible movie, but the physics are just so… WRONG.) Apparently, people used to be constrained to their local Allod, whilst the mage priesthood maintained the means to travel between them… until someone went and discovered that you could just go sail around in space, looking for other Allods.
Tina Charles – Dr Love
This could be the future of Africa and perhaps an opposition party whose youth shows it will indeed embrace the intent of its post-apartheid nickname, ‘The Rainbow Nation.’
- David Bowie doing whatever he wants as it's been so long since he did anything live...but with Ronno guesting on Moonage Daydream and Hendrix opening the show with a ten minute intro to Station To Station before Bowie even strolls on.
I stopped doing it. I think maybe I've been trying to get
Of my ever being.
This book was penned by two meteorologists and is filled with simple weather forecasting experiments for kids. It opens with directions on keeping a weather log and does a great job of provoking kids to make observations and predictions about the weather based on a series of questions. The rest of the book contains a ton of weather forecasting experiments, fun facts about weather, and Q&A with the meteorologists who wrote the book. It's a really fun way to get students to think differently about weather predicting and experiment to better understand it.
For start off, I cut the backing paper out of a piece of my own stock of 12x12
John Tyler succeeded William Henry Harrison after he died (one month after his inauguration speech). His campaign would be very in vogue today as he was a wealthy aristocrat who portrayed himself as an average guy who liked hard cider and log cabins, unlike his opponent, William McKinley. And, John Tyler who served as President from 1841-1845 has two living grandsons — yes, 170 after his presidency, his grandson is alive. Three generations spanning 200 years. Crazy. How? John Tyler fathered a child at age 68 and his son was a father at age 75. John Tyler’s grandsons are in their 80s.
That brings us to last night. I met with Kristina, and Jay, who has spent some time in Australia (so her English is quite good). We went to a place called “All-American Diner” where I ate vegetables heated up from the freezer (crinkle-cut carrots! Yay! I felt like I was in America!) and drank water. We talked for a while and then we helped decorate their Christmas tree. I was fortunate enough to put the “Merry Christmas” in the branches. It was so American! Do the Americans only celebrate Christmas? I’m not sure what it’s like in the melting pot. Anyway. It was a quick ride back to Gunsan and a restful, dream-filled sleep.
Raising kids is just like any other phase in life. You can look back and wish you would have know this or that and how you would have done things differently. But that is the beauty in growth, we need that to learn. Even the hardest lessons we go through that wish we would have know things and done them differently will help us in the future. I have to remember that so I don't have regret. I can learn from relationships I do regret to not enter new ones of that kind, I can learn from mistakes I made with Piper and then on Beckett and do things differently with the consecutive kids. All we can do is keep trying, growing and bettering ourselves. Keep learning.
My boys are in the home stretch for the school year. Unfortunately, being this close to finishing does not always translate into inspiring them to work harder or faster. Nicky's been ready to be through with school since February, and for the last four months, teaching him has had all the stimulation of pushing a wheelbarrow full of boulders uphill. Monday I pointed out to him that he would be finished by the end of the week, but even that didn't motivate him. I've pushed and prodded until finally, this morning, he came bounding into the room, happily announcing that today he will finish with school for the summer. Of course, today he stays at home with his dad so apparently he's going to be motivated for him. Figures.
Now, on to picture books: There are a couple reasons I represent them, but the most significant is that I love them. I’ve always been a passionate reader and have so many distinct memories of the picture books I read as a child – this is when I began to understand the pleasure of a good book. As an adult I’ve grown to admire the way the limitations of the form inspire the most careful selection of words; and the way a successful picture book marries story and art to create a whole greater than its parts.
I have had very little luck on TPT so far, but I do offer only five items. I have had four sales in all in four months. I know I can get several more items up, but time doesn't exactly permit at times. I do not know how to promote a store, and it even seems like a challenge to promote this weblog so people know the store exists in the first place.
who believe in the opposite, more enlightening side of the prophesy.
Needless to say, every time that I was told by a gentleman that he was not ready to be in a relationship, said gentleman wound up in a relationship with somebody else in one or two or three or four months. (Thanks, Facebook!)
now onto some sneaks for the MAY KIT OF THE MONTH...
... so was sober enough to peel the sprouts myself)
And before you leave, stop by Washington DC and grab a politician under one arm, and a reporter under the other and take them with you.
The success of Rick Riordan’s novel (at the time that I am writing it is in the top 25 on several Amazon lists) subverts the notion that “mainstream” audiences will not read books about people that look differently from them or about worlds and ideologies that lie outside the expected Western landscapes. Traditional publishers need to abandon this sort of reasoning as an excuse as to why they are not actively cultivating works by authors of color.
Maybe that is the reason why Mr Lanzi is president for Europe, Middle East and Africa, and not Asia.
What is my greatest wish?
Pluto in Capricorn symbolizes a cycle of the ultimate in centralized control over the people-at-large. We now have an unholy alliance between transnational corporations, banking giants, and the government. The U.S. Military, the NSA, the CIA, and the FBI are increasing their power incrementally, with each piece of new legislation. The end result: our constitutional rights have been subverted. There are some people who say all this is necessary to catch and stop terrorists. There is merit to this, but not to the extent that we give up our essential rights and freedoms as a democratic republic. This rationale was used in Nazi Germany and Communist Russia and history has shown us the results. Uranus in Aries (the people) is forming an intense square (conflict) with Pluto. My take is that the government and powers-that-be know that this nation is descending into poverty and that discontent will prevail as people are emerging from a long “coma” of denial and compliance. They are making extensive preparations for protesters, both armed and peaceful.
Can you reject what I love
I have 5 or 6 cherry plants--they were a big hit last year
Chris & Jess
What it does tell me is that some very smart person invented a sign which caught the public attention and should have made that smart person an awful lot of money.
I never thought I could have it so good.
Be enough to make you stay.
Subtotal: $26.79 (With shipping: $37.79)
But however it came about, the fact is that within a year of this casual introduction to horror movies Raven had entirely forsworn radio work in favour of this new direction, even to the extent of telling one interviewer that he would turn down non-horror film roles if they came his way.
Anyway, as I was saying the cat never got to use some dVerse ideas here and there and so I saved them up for later on for many to glare and so comes forth the nightmare. Although it is going to have such flair.
Combom himself:
Greed is the root of all evil, therefore you should give us what we want because it's not fair for you to have it when we don't.
Remember the first time you ever ate a peach? The soft sweetness crushed between your teeth, the delicious juice running down your chin?
you might recall when i first cut my hair in preparation for losing it all due to chemo (watch it HERE). justin and i went together. we took before and after pictures and video. it was quite the ordeal. i went from happy, to furious, to mostly not happy. i hated my first hair cut. i walked out of the salon and yelled lots of four letter words. i hated it. not sure if i hated the hair cut or just hated that i had to cute my hair altogether. either way it was a dramatic, emotional, tough day. but we made it. i made it through 12 chemo treatments and held on to some of my hair. i started wearing a hat in mid december when it started to get real thin. it kept getting thinner and thinner but i never lost it all. so i decided not to shave it but opted for to keep my thinning hair and wear a hat. i own several hats but my grey hat always seems to be my first choice. kinda gross that i wore the same exact hat for basically 14 weeks. that might be a little weird. but it seemed normal to me. i basically wanted to wear my hat for as long as i could and then wait a little until it started to grow back and then we would go short. pixie cut style. since that it was justin has wanted since day one. but i was never ready.
“In travelling throughout the length and breadth of our country over the last few years, I have met and interacted with a lot of Malaysians from all walks life and learned much, which I now can put to good use for the next phase of my life,” he told Malaysiakini.
To test your knowledge of exactly how the tax filing process works, and to provide a dawdling exercise for those who still have not filed, let's take this brief quiz.
I found myself wanting to keep adding more to my card, but I tried to kept in mind that this was a clean and simple challenge and so this is what I ended up with. My card is basically just some stamping. I did stamp and cut out the one bunch of bananas- the bunch in the monkey's hands. I used my scallop border punch for the little bit of daffodil delight card stock on the left side of my card and I added three score lines just above my sentiment using my simply scoring tool.
The interesting thing, however, was that despite ignoring all side-quests, my time with L.A. Noire nonetheless benefited from their presence. It was my decision to flout them, and it was meaningful because of that. Here I was being prompted to break character and meddle with the story, and, each time, my decisions drew me a little closer into L.A. Noire's fiction. Had its side-quests been removed, announcements over the dispatch would have just been background noise: Phelps would have made the decision to ignore them without consulting me. The creative role of players in a story can be diminished to little more than an audience if they are not presented with real opportunities to interpret or defy the role assigned to them.
iadgsuhadsiucfndvasihpofzdskj;ldvkdgs
My husband Ben had surgery at Forrest General about two years prior to me having Reid. Everything went successfully and he had no follow-up appointments or any reason to return to that doctor in Hattiesburg Clinic . He liked his doctor and so a year and a half later when he had a completely unrelated issue, he went back to the same doctor and I happened to go with him. We were told by the receptionist not to worry about our $20 co-pay because we had a "credit" there from them overcharging us from the previous surgery because our insurance paid more than they had estimated. I asked what amount, and it was nearly $240! I demanded to know why we had not received a reimbursement check in a year and a half especially because we had no reason to return and use the credit there! If we had not just so happened to use the same doctor I don't think we would have ever found out that they owed us money!
So this is supposed to be an Abita amber ale... Its good, kinda typical with a little bit of that soapy taste... I should drink it again, but its not my favorite. But you know what I completely forgot to do a flavor wheel or write an actual review since I was too busy eating my diner...
What I don't like...
Recent archaeological and DNA evidence support this theory, but researchers at The University of Tokyo wondered if additional clues might be found by tracing dozens of distinct dialects back through time to their earliest common ancestor.
Learn how to make an awesome resume from one of UW Career Center’s Career Counselors!
~ Think about dinner ... load crockpot, take out something to thaw, etc. (today is spagetti and meatballs made from scratch from Ina Garten's Barefoot Contessa site ... this is the best meatball recipe I've ever tried!)
Time's hoggish minions
Speaking of pants. Shredder rocks the glitter. Shredder will probably be all molded rubber a la Batman or futuristic Teflon/plastic armor. Sparkly polyester spandex is much more practical for being a ninja. It also shows that he’s confident with his self-presentation because real men can wear anything and still be vengeful tyrants whose plan to rule the NYC black market involves being the mob boss of a bunch of teenage hooligans.
Is there anyone that hasn't read this delightful series? I love it so, so much. I re-read Anna & The French Kiss before I read Lola and I know I'll re-read Lola again. Love, love, love. This book was gifted by my husband to me for our second wedding anniversary.
Repeat. Over and over again...and again....and again...and well sometime's it can just feel boring.
My kids refuse to eat pizza anymore. Like… WILL NOT TAKE A BITE.
and now there are none, only a slightly queasy Pipany left to mark their passing. I just couldn't stop popping another one into my greedy mouth, so delicious was the stuff with its sugary sweetness balanced perfectly by crunchy peanuts. I challenge anyone to resist! By the way, did you know that eating a piece of this fudge followed by a salt and vinegar flavoured crisp changes the taste of the crisp to prawn cocktail? No? Thought not.
Talia Garduna
259Nature stands check'd; Religion disapproves;
Cambie St & 29th Ave – 8:00-8:05am
I can't say I disagree. While baggage fees have inspired me to pack lighter, I simply carry on my (fewer) belongings now, instead of paying to have them checked. I can say undoubtedly, that I would never fly an airline that would require such ridiculous fees. I prefer to do business with people who appreciate my patronage, rather than people trying to stick me with unprecedented charges.
So, life lesson # 1: If there’s a girl who by virtue of her bothersomeness begins to appear unprepossessing to you, tell her she reminds you of Jane Eyre. While she’ll be rather delighted that she reminds you of a heroine of a best-selling classic, you’ll have the pleasure of calling someone Ugly Duckling.
Ah, I was talking about myself. What else?
Self-verification theory, the brainchild of Bill Swann at the University of Texas, Austin, posits that despite the desire for social approval and praise people also have a deep-seated need to be seen in ways consistent with their self-views (see Swann, 1997 for review). This works well for individuals with positive self-views such as those with high self-esteem. These individuals like themselves, think that they are lovable, competent, and worthy and want others to see them favorably as well. Not surprising, right?
when the Qur’an was first revealed to prophet Muhammed Sallahu Alaihi Wasallam) through Jibraeel (Alaihis-salaam) his age was 40 years.
now harnessed
1. Turning the baby from the outside. 2. C- Section... I go back next week for one more ultrasound to make sure that he hasn't flipped around and then we will make the call. I already know the call I'm making, C-Section. No one is going to try and turn a baby that is inside of me. It is starting the be bad enough when he moves the wrong way and I have a head shoved up in my ribs, much less having someone FORCE him into position. Nothankyouverymuch.
Stage 2: Develop a wordless book based on the Born to Fly storyline and distribute it to kids worldwide. Why wordless? So we don’t have to translate it into hundreds of languages—saving thousands of hours and dollars.
Srila Prabhupada, you are the seer of past, present and future. You have forewarned of all that was to happen in ISKCON. In your transcendental vani lie the answers for everything. Your transcendental instructions and association of likeminded sadhus are all that is required to go back to Godhead this very life as assured by Your Divine Grace. When the confidential mission of a pure devotee is being obviously disturbed, it is the duty of every disciple to do something to quell such disturbance. It is only in such a spirit of service to Your Divine Grace that, we devotees in Bangalore are engaged in vigorously propagating your instructions regarding initiation in ISKCON. It is not in the attitude of being ‘holier than thou’ meaning holier than other Vaishnavas in this world. I am ever grateful to Your Divine Grace for sheltering us so lovingly and protecting our devotional service in spite of always falling short of sufficient faith and devotion unto your lotus feet. Please bless me so that I can be worthy of being the servant of the servant of the most sincere and obedient disciples of Your Divine Grace. It is only by your causeless mercy that I am engaged in devotional service since I am not worthy of it and have no personal qualification to be engaged thus. I am eternally indebted to Your Divine Grace for your eternal shelter, kindness and continued flow of mercy.
-$100 covers up to 4 sessions. Choose whichever months you like.
Freda and Brenda are two young women, with seemingly only their youth in common. Freda is a large brassy blonde with a personality to match and aspirations to act. In contrast, Brenda is dark and rather passive, but has run away to London from her drunken farmer husband, and ended up being adopted by Brenda. The girls share a bedsit in North London, and a large double-bed – with a bolster down the middle!
unhappy.
If I could imagine a work of literature in Yiddish, what would it be? An epic poem about today's Chasidim, written in Chasidic Yiddish, perhaps. Or a sprawling novel of contemporary Jewish life (about either sector, ultra-Orthodox or secular) written by an observer "on the other side." More than likely, though, the coming Yiddish classic will be written in a genre not even on my radar, outside my dyadic model of contemporary Yiddish culture. I look forward to it.
Looking For Alaska or just Alaska, is written from the perspective of Miles Halter (more affectionately known as Pudge), a teenager fascinated by famous last words, one in particular that leads him to leave his home in Florida and attend boarding school in Alabama, in search of the Great Perhaps.
The Vein of Gold by Julia Cameron
Hank: You've thought about this.
There by the jukebox, where I don’t feel so alone
Why does it retain its power to chill? I don't think it's about fear of distraction or domesticity. I think it's a fear of babies. Being a parent – or really loving someone other than yourself, whether that's your children, parents or your lover – forces you to confront a horrible truth: the fact that we get older. The amazing boy who was born when I was still a student is a man now. There is no way that I can still think of myself as "quite young, really" or "a child at heart". Parenthood confronts us with our own mortality, every day.
Layer the quilt with backing and batting. I used a scrap of wool batting, because I like the puffiness - it shows the quilting really well. Foil batting would be good for a mug rug.
It would mean a lot if you have an account and like this. Well, I really think my entry should win because this set has it all! Whenever you like to be green, here is a style guide.
A lot of times I will have a cup of tea with my snack. I only use Licorice Root, Marshmallow Root or Ginger Root tea.
…to quote a completely different song…
I'd wear expensive shoes with red bottoms.
Enchiladas can be eaten all freaking year, so I opted for some Rock and Roll instead. 2012's Cinco De Mayo, a night usually reserved for chips and salsa and doing tequila shots off muffin tops, will go down as a major milestone for New York City's prodigious party bringers The Dirty Pearls.
In 2006, the ELL department developed ‘Embedding Latino Culture in the K-3 Social Studies Curriculum. General education teachers attend workshops to learn how to embed elements of Latino culture in the social studies curriculum. They also receive Latino culture kits, which include lesson plans, books, flags, maracas, and other items.
The bottom line: The Write Agenda is not a credible group--not just because of the trollish obviousness of its agenda, but because whoever is behind it isn't brave enough to publicly own their words. So if you're alarmed by finding your name on its "boycott" list, or by its so-called B.A.D. Project (which supposedly disseminates the list to libraries and bookstores), or if its one-star reviews show up again on your books--don't be concerned. In fact, consider it a badge of honor.
Such arrangements comprise standard construction industry practice in commercial projects and there is no reason in principle why they cannot be applied to the construction of dwellings.
Debs seems to be spending a huge amount of time designing covers and writing blurbs and pitches now she's leapt into the world of e-publishing. She's all about saturation! She's also writing the first 5000 words for the Good Housekeeping New Novelist comp.
It took mere seconds for me to realize that my relief was only partially warranted. Mike Daisey exaggerated many of the details in his story, and This American Life should not have run it without thorough fact checking. But the inhumane working conditions that Daisey described have been verified by the New York Times, the BBC, CNN, and the Guardian. I’ve seen the photos of the employee dorms and the suicide nets. It’s real, and I’m still a part of it.
care about little people - I demonstrate
Me: Hubby, let’s sell our China.
--And finally, is there anything else that you would like to add?
Daniel got to his feet and started towards the older man. “It’s easy, doctor.”
resounding chord
3/4 cup pecans, chopped (my choice, optional)
NO NO NO. I have played this game many times in order to survive. Every time, I end up getting worn-down emotionally. The game has its consequences for me as little pieces of my soul are chipped away every time I kiss that NPD butt.
interview with
Chard from the Seattle Tilth sale last May is still producing. I just checked to see that their edible plant sales are not that far away. Here's a link to their website.
The fortress’ lofty location, its layered formation and watch tower all indicate the work of a people who would stop at nothing to protect their heritage.
There was a lot of back-and-forth about whether Grace wanted to wear a veil or not, but in the end, she wanted the veil. We were in the first row - thank you Nora, Len, Kerri and Mark for the great seat-saving - and were able to watch her walk down the aisle. She was so peaceful - you could just see it in her eyes. And then we all watched as she received her First Communion. It was a special moment and we were so happy to be able to share it with our family.
With their very life to satisfy
Into the citadel we went, following the old route from the wall, over the bridge, and to Fyst’s roof-top throne pavilion. Fyst no longer does his disappearing act it seems, so we wiped our feet on his throne, pee’d in his ice bucket, and pointed out the bad aiming plan for the Arm of Innoruk.
Lower print costs (than other alternative options UKUnpublished had available) - which may encourage higher sales
Indie publishing reviews aim for the same result, but let's face it, they are often written by indie authors themselves, with experience of hands on small press publication or self publishing, and that experience together with the fact that indie review sites and magazines are read by the same people, results in reviews that look far beyond just the 'read'. The reviewer is examining 'the Book' as well as reading the book, capital 'B' for book. That means how it smells as well as how it talks.
Friday, December 21st--I had an appointment with an MHMR nurse.
Anyhoo, Heaton Road is the area that I grew up in in the 70's and 80's and I attended the nearby North View School which has now been demolished. If anyone has any photos of the school that they would like to share with readers of this site please get in touch.
Please check for the buyer reviews & ratings of JTL TL-750 Everlight Tungsten Light Kit, with Three Everlights, 750w HQ Bulbs, Power Cables, SoftBoxes, Connectors, Stands, Case & Bonus 4-leaf Barn Doors from the merchant’s website by click on the link below.
You know me by now, so let me restate that a confident woman, happy in herself and her body, is going to deliver the sexual goods ten times better than a nail-biting lunatic and she might not even write cringe-inducing poetry if she doesn’t get a call back. But men usually figure that one out for themselves. In time.
If you are above the enemies, then there is no need to fear them. You just need to exercise your God-given authority over them and remind them that they are beneath and not above. Jesus said in Mk.16:17 that in His Name, we will cast out demons. So, cast them out in the Name of Jesus! The armor of God protects you as you face your enemies but the moment you turn around and flee in fear, you’re exposed because what God has given us is a breastplate of righteousness not a back-plate! As you begin your walk with God today, declare victory and walk in it! When someone speaks unkindly towards you, speak gently towards them for “a gentle answer turns away wrath, but a harsh word stirs up anger.” (Prov.15:1) When you feel like fighting back, exercise restrain and remember that your God is the God who says, “vengeance is Mine!” (Rom.12:19). Enjoy Him, love Him, serve Him, reflect Him.
I also suspect I might have pulled up more plants than weeds, but it'll be fine, I hid them well underneath the pile of nettles and dandelions etc, I'm pretty sure nobody will find out.
raisins 1 tbsp
This decision was not an easy one, as I mentioned in my letter to students. It’s one that I agonized over. I would even go so far as to say I fought the Lord on this. But in His grace, the Lord has used the last few weeks to remind me of what it means to truly rely on Him and what it means to be continually focused on eternity, rather than the here and now. Another constant theme He has been bringing up through every means possible is that suffering, hardship, and struggle lead to great spiritual maturity.
I'd be lost without Etsy. Seriously! It can be a bit overwhelming unless you are looking for something specific. An unbelievable resource for unique pieces, purchasing directly from the artist.
Proverbs 14:29
Elvis opens his hands and in it is.....
And when Obama offered the backhanded compliment “You’re likeable enough, Hillary” in a New Hampshire debate, some women may have wondered why we never heard this kind of jab at John Edwards or Bill Richardson.
Q. Can you tell us briefly about yourself?
According to a source associated with the romantic film, “Considering the kind of close friendship Ayan shares with Ranbir, he’s aware of the relationship the actor shared with Deepika. At the same time, he was also well aware of their split when he offered his film to her. His story has a few intimate scenes between the lead pair.”
The illustration did not include a caption linking it to the written piece – but did include the name of the artist, a W.F. West student.
A Kentucky jury has ruled for a doctor in a penis amputation suit. They said that the evidence did not stand up in court and the lawyers did not rise to the occasion.
His heart attack in May 1971 would change that. I’m not sure he was still looking for work by then; but if he was, that’s when he stopped. By the time I was born, my grandfather had been retired for more than two years, and scenes like this were part of the past.
I’m considering changing my name to Meli$$a.
- I also learnt that the police were raiding hotel rooms on the pretext of looking for “khalwat possibilities”. JAWI must be very displeased that their prerogative of catching people in dishabille was usurped by the men in blue.
1 here's
by making the consciousness of who you are in Christ Jesus real to you.
We must also realize that we do not deserve Jehovah’s grace, but deserve death. “For the wages of sin is death” (Romans 6:23a). Everything in life costs us something; nothing is free. Some costs we eagerly pay and others we are reluctant to pay, but life is a costly thing. Life costs us, male and female alike, something of each other in order to conceive a new life (child). The creation of the human race cost God, as well. Life cost Him, in the beginning, a piece of Himself — the breath of life and His image or spirit (Genesis 1:26-27). Life also cost Him the loss of our companionship when we sinned in the garden, as sin ushered in death, and death costs us our own lives as payment and prevents us from living with God eternally (again, see Romans 6:23a). But it’s because the Lord God, Jehovah, loved life — human life — so very much, it ultimately cost Him the life of His only Son, Jesus Christ. This truth is another aspect of experiencing a true faith in God. You can’t fully enjoy a relationship with God the Father until you understand fully the relationship we are to have with God the Son.
As a wrap-up to this blog, I thought I'd post a list of four month's worth of meals. I kind of miss keeping track of what we're eating, but I don't miss the burden of feeling like I have to blog every single night. So without further ado:
Black and navy jacket, Forever 21. Black dress, London Times. Patent navy belt, The Limited. Black patent maryjanes, Xhilaration. Stainless steel watch, Gucci. Rhinestone star earrings.
White Fish (cod, haddock, tilapia)
I think thats it?
a home without friends,
Not such a bad idea, is it? I'd rather have that day off than May Day. Those, like me, not entirely up to speed on the lives of the saints might be interested to know that Boniface is that unicorn rare thing, a genuine English saint. He was martyred by Frisians, that is the people, rather than the livestock.
I sacrificed whatever I had to hopefully leave whatever pain you caused behind
In comparing population sizes of each region to the average proportion of money these areas were receiving from the government fund, it becomes clear many are not being given representative help.
Down. But well done to Khairul Fahmie Che Mat for saving 4 goal attacks from Singapore. He definitely deserves for best player title tonight.
Now why did I just embolden a few sentences? The whole letter should be in bold... Where's my blue pencil?
“A man who is a politician at forty is a statesman at three score and ten. It is at this age, when he would be too old to be a clerk or a gardener or a police-court magistrate, that he is ripe to govern a country. This is not so strange when you reflect that from the earliest times the old have rubbed it into the young that they are wiser than they, and before the young had discovered what nonsense this was they were old too, and it profited them to carry on the imposture…”
I look at you and am reminded that my worrying is futile. Your peach fuzz has turned into a mass of red ringlets, you walk and run just fine, you adore your life as a big sister, you (mostly) sleep through the night. You do all those things I feared you would never do and so much more. You bring joy; you carry it on you like a natural perfume. Your natural tendency is to yell and laugh and clap in delight. It brings those around you joy too.
I have been a cloth convert for a while now. Started using a different brand when Xave was about 6 months old and slowly over time built my stash. Once Stels came along, both kids were in cloth full time.
Junsu’s corner lips lift up a little sign that he is smiling. “Kill me.”
Lill: I know right? My Brazilian hasn’t even gotten me the dude that hands out fried chicken flyers in our lobby.
It was nice it came with a key chain and although not shown in the pic, it did come with a stand, but I thought it looked better without it.
In an attempt to control the size of the “to be read” pile (“TBR” to the bookworms), I generally borrow audio books from the library that I already have in some other form at home.
One night I dreamed that my grandmother was healed. An angel disguised as a nurse permitted me to speak to her and in that dream my grandmother held my hand, finally, as I had held hers all those years ago. She looked into my eyes and told me that she needed to leave, that I would be fine as long as I was strong. I awoke with a start, crying silent tears that turned into sobs that wracked my entire body, shook me so much that my mother came into the room to comfort me and slept next to me. Later I began to see the ways that her sickness had molded my path. I began to see how the little pieces of my life fit together, the bad leading to the good.
Coat minced pork with corn flour and deep fry them until golden brown. Put the deep fried pork aside. Heat up wok and pour in a little vegetable oil. Saute garlic until fragrant. Add a little water, tomato sauce, onion, bell pepper, salt and sugar. Bring to a boil.
Where the book misses its greatest potential is in the sff aspect which the author uses to justify the chases and men in black as Kino's movies..., well read the book to find out why they are believed to be important even today. That part is sadly glossed over as if the author wanted to write a "realistic thriller" and was embarrassed to delve too much into the sfnal; too bad, as the potential loss there is significant, but at least the finale of the novel stands back from the men in black and that was a big plus for me.
Decorative tapes, like this 2" version designed by Charlotte Moss for Calico Corners are easy to sew onto fabric, adding a lot of pizzazz to otherwise plain or simple beginnings.
While my dentist punctures the upper left side of my mouth with a second round of anesthesia, in rushes the hygienist who has been cleaning my teeth every six months for the last three years.
"A human." The other man shook his head, winced again. "It's not important. Let's get this door open."
“We congratulate Mary, Lisa and Steve for receiving the fragrance industry’s recognition of the groundbreaking success of My Life — its distinct scent, Mary’s inspiring story, and the innovative business model for distribution,” Grossman said. “We will will continue to reinforce our role as a disruptive force in the retail industry and bring products to our customers via unique marketing strategies.”
Special hostesses called waiter girls worked the halls, socializing with the men and generally encouraging the purchase of more drinks. In addition to their own beverages, the men would buy drinks for the ladies, who wisely only pretended to imbibe them. Waiter girls wore distinctive short dresses and high boots, smoked cigars, and offered to sit in your lap. They were a cross between a hostess and a waitress, but many doubled as performers in the variety show and/or your “date” for the evening back at the hotel.
It was an absolutely beautiful day and the villages, set on the river but climbing the hillsides, were very prettty in the sunshine. We knew that by taking the boat we were going to miss some of these villages, especially the artist colony at Szentendre, but we had enough time so that after we had settled in Budapest we could visit these villages by riding upstream from the city on day rides and this is what we did so we figured we got the best of both worlds: we saw the river from the boat and we pedaled through the villages in a very relaxed fashion as hunting for a room and route finding were no longer issues.
I was there in 1986, on my previous trip to North Korea. It is clearly a bunker with a giant building on top of it, containing all the gifts showered on the late Great Leader Kim Il-sung by other world leaders who were/are all, of course, in awe of his charismatic omniscience.
Add a photo and add some effects on it using the in-app Instagram like features. Downside, there aren’t that many free filters, you can buy a few others, but the choice on both is quite limited, but this is uber-cool all the same. Negative point (if it matters to you): you can only pick a photo from the camera roll album, not from other albums on your phone. I like things in folders so my camera roll is usually quite dire about the time I think I want to share it on Path! I think they need to add a few more filters, Instagrammy kind of frame options and seeing as they are doing so great anyway, I reckon they need to add an option to add our own watermark!
The pleasure is when you cut through air at 50 kmp or 100.
this outfit, little hints of white, not obvious, but
"By the grace God has given me, I laid a foundation as a wise builder, and someone else is building on it. But each one should build with care. For no one can lay any foundation other than the one already laid, which is Jesus Christ. If anyone builds on this foundation using gold, silver, costly stones, wood, hay or straw, their work will be shown for what it is, because the Day will bring it to light. It will be revealed with fire, and the fire will test the quality of each person’s work. If what has been built survives, the builder will receive a reward. If it is burned up, the builder will suffer loss but yet will be saved—even though only as one escaping through the flames."
I am still only part way through organising it within the cupboard, but basically items with their own packages or cases are stored in small boxes (like photocopy paper boxes or shoeboxes) by brand
Roll onto a floured surface and cut into shapes. Place on parchment lined baking sheets (I recommend freezing the cut out shape on the baking sheet for 5 minutes before baking) and bake for 10-12 minutes. Let sit a few minutes on the sheet, then transfer to a cooling rack.
We’re going on a cardio-free diet. Step away from the treadmill and the other gym machines.
That will be better for you if you but know (V.61:11 )
Marvin's life and music and murder has become the stuff of legend, and as I watched and thought of that I had to realize that many of the American Olympians weren't even alive when Marvin gave that performance. I found it hard to believe that I recall that period of time that some many others at this moment weren't even present for. All of this brought a thought I have considered for some time, that as much as Brooklyn, New York and the World are changing, it's really eras of time that are drifting glacier-like across a sea of time.
Martin 2, Nixon 1 (girls).
smiled as she tasted its rich aroma The daughter then asked, "What does it
My only regret is that I didn't know about this sooner.
Mad Meg Farmhouse Provision Ale (Draught)
With word getting round, Price did what dodgy agents often do: he changed the company's name. In 2002, Avalon vanished and Media Arts International took its place. The M.O. was basically the same: upfront representation fees for writers; a production website with suspiciously enormous numbers of projects, none of which, somehow, ever came to fruition; false claims of contacts, meetings, etc. This time, though, Price did send round a few manuscripts, and even managed to place several books with a publisher called First Century (here's a news story about one of them). Again, though, not everything was as it seemed. As I later found out from one sadder-but-wiser ex-Price client, First Century was a vanity publisher. (It now appears to be out of business.)
Do you know anyone on Tumblr in real life?
We can use this framework with the combination of DNS spoofing or Man-in-the-middle attack in order to spoof the software upgrade. This therefore tricks the victim into downloading the upgrade, thereby executing our malicious arbitrary code.
Green Flash Brewing Co. Green Flash West Coast I.P.A.
She hit the flo (she hit the floor) next thing you know shorty got low low low low low”
I learned a ton about them by taking this time and using the assessment tools. I added in a few things too once I saw their weak areas. Sorry no photos – I forgot to bring my camera outside with us. :-(
"hold still, THIS IS something to blog" and snaps a pic of me with my peanut butter and jam muffin with the cat in my robe. I s'pose I live an odd life by some standards.
But next, they wandered down the street,
V/A - Hot Curly Weenie (Recess Records comp with dwarves, FYP, propagandhi and more)
Pretty tasty for your basic eggs. Christine went big, and chose the amazing Kaiser-Schmarrn, (ie, scrambled souffle/pancakey thingamajigs.)
Tyler Seguin
About a week ago she started trying crawling off and on, however, I think she realizes that her 'scoot' action is just as efficient. Sometimes she'll crawl for a bit and then give up and scoot the rest of the way to her destination. This week, she started getting up on her knees and attempting to pull herself up using one of us or the couch/futon/anything else she can reach. This has lead to a few face-plants, a bruise on her temple, and frustration. Today, in the midst of pulling herself up on her crib, her leg (thigh) became stuck between the crib railing. Luckily, as I panicked, Tyler came in and was able to 'free' her. After that we opted for a trip to GG Thompsons' house.
At the time, the Hawks said the probe was preliminary. In July, Malema said he was not engaged in illegal activities.
The day after he returned, Stephanie and I made a trip to our old home in Alabama. We stayed with friends and engaged in a great deal of female hunting: bargain shopping at a variety of places, including thrift stores and Catos. (I love that place!) I did have cell phone service the entire time we were gone, though, and Indiana took full advantage of that fact.
Feed, water chickens and gather eggs
Radzi, a reporter with the Sun, was beaten up by as many as eight police at Jalan Raja.
government big - and who was really right?
Hope to see you tonight at the SALE!
The concept of a roasted vegetable salad makes perfect sense for this transitional season. The roasting brings a warm sweetness to the vegetables and the salad dressing keeps this dish rooted in summer with its acidic brightness. Pumpkins, sweet potatoes and Bosc pears are a great combination, cubed up and roasted till golden and then dressed with a simple vinaigrette fragrant with tangerine zest and Dijon mustard. Sweet, tart, seasonal and oh so colorful!
If you're tickled that its spring, and you want to dance and sing,
Here is a cute little poem I'd like to share with you (since I have nothing better to post).
Today’s challenge is another easy one.
Feel the flutter of light breezes that flow across your skin with the flapping of fairies wings.
Total Personnel: 1,335
Perhaps solar-powered bedrock-sintering is the next logical step for Kayser's technology: 3D-printing whole mountain landscapes from artificially produced magmatic lumps, like something from a fever-dream by Vicente Guallart.
I was so perplexed by these expert suggestions that I had to call a friend to come over and watch the video again. She said that it reminded her of an infomercial/instructional video on how to slice a mango.
These days, my work is both a mix of ‘career’ and sometimes feels a bit like of a “calling” too. It’s intrinsically connected to who I am (my core values, strengths, etc.). I feel authentic in my work and passionate about (most of) it. Still, I get paid for my work and in many cases it’s based on an hourly rate. Would my clients expect me to give away my time for free? Not really. That said, I often put in extra hours because sometimes it’s what I need to do. I’m engaged…and care deeply about the quality of my work and my relationships with my clients.
無言 むごん, mugon = silence
Conservationists have previously been aware that lion bones were being used in Chinese brews believed to have healing properties, but they have only recently become aware of the scale of the trade in other Asian countries.
Looking to the opening race, the teams will have a challenge with the revised Sakhir track. Its not that the track layout is particularly demanding, indeed the tracks previous character of medium speed corners has been dumbed down with a new twistier section added. Instead it’s the heat that will punish the teams, who of course have only tested pre-season at cold or wet Spanish tracks.
Mr. Williams’ life and music will be discussed by Old Time Country Music Hall of Famer Mr. Murphy.
"Left Hand Inside Panel"
After Gilman I rode me bicycle all the way down to the Ruby Room (downtown Oakland!), which was actually quite fun. I haven't done a long Eastbay night hellride like that in a while. Got there by 1am, enough time to get some dranks in and comingle with comely punk coeds, who were swaying to the stylings of DJ Nipple.
Recently I’ve sat in a couple of gatherings of local government IT, economic development and other department managers who are planning broadband strategy for their respective towns or regions. One theme pops up frequently, and it’s about those broadband maps.
FACULTY
Here is the final photo from the food styling chapter where we detail how to style this dish.
Then there is Mitt Romney, known as 'the flip-flop". Romney can't seem to stick to one side of any issue which means he'd be a puppet for stronger personalities (by stronger, I mean corporations with lots of money to donate, contribute, or just hand over). Romney claims to be some sort of wizard in the field of jobs creations, saying that's what he's been doing all his life. The reality is, Mitt buys companies in trouble, and tears them apart for resale. It's much like the character played by Richard Gere in Pretty Woman. Gere's company bought other companies and sold them off for parts, basically. Only in the movie, Gere realizes he isn't accomplishing anything, "We don't MAKE anything", he says; and he's right. Somehow, I don't think even a pretty hooker could make Romney have that sort of epiphany.
Knowing we could still have frosty, snowy days through April.
Average Price: $7.99 six-pack
Although we don't know about that "undisclosed" location. Perhaps brilliant FBI profiler Douglas didn't investigate that part?
To focus on the question: the best way to determine what works is to sample. I have been copying Paternayan tapestry yarn, and though you'd expect it to be worsted prepared and spun, I get closer to the yards per pound with carded fiber spun woolen. YPP is a good measurement to take because it varies based on fiber prep and spinning style... Combed fiber spins into a denser fiber generally, and worsted style spinning also spins into a denser yarn. So for lighter yarn (more YPP for the same weight of fiber) use carded fiber and woolen spinning.
Information about the Author: John Corey Whaley grew up in the small town of Springhill, Louisiana. He has a B.A. in English from Louisiana Tech University, as well as an M.A in Secondary English Education. He currently teaches at a middle school in Shreveport, Louisiana. Where Things Come Back is his first novel.
You ain’t never caught a rabbit
I firmly believe you only get out of a story what you are willing to put in. *sweeping curtsey* My horns off to the vast majority of talented authors that pour their blood, sweat, and tears into their work. Please know that you leave your readers shedding the same right along with you. Nothing beats vivid imagery, deep characters, and a heart breaking or breathtaking plot, especially if it is well written.
and today..
* Image: Penny Black, Bunny Friends
The problem for Abhisit “Discontent Generating Plan” is, Thailand’s Consumer Confidence Index is up to stand at a seven months high after tanking deep because of last year’s flooding. Then the Thai stock market is at about an 18 years high. And the latest poll on Yingluck’s popularity, it is up again, as it had been moving up now since last year’s flood ended.
Jonas Thor Gudmundsson (Ruxpin)
Bruce Hornsby & The Range The way it is US
Raise you hand if you've ever tried quinoa. What? You've never heard of it? Well, let me tell you a little about it. Pronounced keen-wah, it is a grain, usually used as a side dish. Quinoa looks similar to couscous, but is cooked like rice. (2-1, water to grain ratio) It's good for you, too. It's actually a complete protein source.
the bulkier embellishments that can be so beguiling . . .
My first attempt was a bit too large and clumsy (I'm not good with satin stitch :-/ )
After half of the band died in 2007, nearly all hope for a reunion seemed to be lost forever, but these legendary experimental grindcore and bizarre noisemongers wouldn’t stay down forever. After nearly a decade of being hassled by after-the-fact fans, it appears that SOAPSCUM (www.myspace.com/soapscum1) is back with a mission. The band, who released only a few copies of its album “At War With Tilex” (on L. Castro’s Drunk Mexican Records) before calling it quits during the recording session for the “Bomb Your Mom” EP, are said to be back in the studio, and lead vocalist/guitarist Nwahs has allegedly found what might be a cure for cancer. According to the man himself “It was during a standard alien abduction that I was told by a higher race of beings that soundwaves could destroy cancer cells. The sounds and tones used to fight the cancer sounded so hideous as to be the opposite of music, yet accoring to those space lord motherfuckers, they had the potential to fight off the cells. Of course I had to take into consideration that the beings that told me this were the same creatures that sucked me up into a mothership and raped me from time to time, but I figured that otherwise, it souded legit.”
It is brilliant big busy city, famous for its awe-inspiring Meenakshi temple. Skyline of Madurai is dominated by four 70 meter high referred as ‘gopurams’ the temple is set in a square, intricately carved and painted brightly. “The city of temples” offers you more than what you have in mind. It’s vibrant out here; the city is also the business capital of south Tamil Nadu. One of those things which have caught my mind is the spirit of this city which is 24X7 ON; it’s one of those cities that never sleep. The richness of their culture is visible in everything. The beauty of the city is that it has retained its ancient cultural heritage with the fast moving technology world.
for the good and the benefit of the U.S.,
So what do you think about my new design?
We both have very weird senses of humor.
You would also think that since this project has been in development for so damn long that everybody involved would actually come up with some new stuff that would still be loyal to The Stooges but also make us laugh, right? However, that’s not the case and instead we get a bunch of material we have seen used from them time and time before such as these guys hitting each other in the head, somehow tied together by a plot of saving an orphanage and having these guys realize that they all love each other. It’s definitely weak in plot terms, but I wasn’t going to see this movie for an Oscar-winning plot, I just wanted to see some funny stuff happen and I barely got that.
Okay, gonna try really hard not to make all these posts about food! But this was the first thing that popped in my head for B. One of my favorite dining establishments on Disney property...along with thousands of other people!
Foil.
Our Japanese maple tree is no longer “in- waiting” for the autumn switch. The clear, crisp nights around and since the Super moon this week have seen a dramatic colour change on most of the tree and today the leaves are dropping in large numbers
Anyway, last week we took a little family trip away. It's important, don't you think? To have some time away together, just enjoying each other's company. I'm not talking expensive, indulgent, extensive holidays at exotic locations - heavens, no. At this point, we'd have enough moolah to cover the cost of the long-term car park at Tullamarine. For a short time. I'm talking cheap, local, activities-like-walking-on-the-beach, budget family holidays.
As promised some cross stitch. I pulled these two projects out of the infinity project bin. The first is an ornament that I fell in love with straight away and ordered all the supplies that year. Which is pretty fast for me. However, it took three years to actually start it. This from Stoney Creek Magazine February 2008.
I've got several very creative local friends but the one I approached first - well, a slight improvement but still not loving it.
The myth of control, especially when it comes to our children and their "destiny", is pervasive. And it starts from conception, in many respects. We don't call it control, mind you, because over the years we as a society have come to see "controlling our children" as a negative thing - which, by the way, it is. But we have not stopped trying to control our kids, we've merely repackaged the ideas of control with new words and phrases. Instead of controlling them, we're "teaching" or "guiding" them for "their own good", or "setting them up for success", or "influencing their decisions" so they can "be accepted in society."
Busy Day Busy People by Tibor Gergely
In the Bible, Exodus 22:18, "thou shalt not suffer a witch to live."
A month ago I was delighted to be hired part time at a lovely book store. My primary duty is to help people find the books they are seeking. Sometimes they know exactly what it is they want. Other times they have somewhat, or even a vague whisper of an idea. Besides the physical help in locating the book, many want advice or suggestions, and sometimes they want someone to listen to not only what they are looking for, but why.
Construction 7 étages
Might you surely plead,
In seeking to respond to these accusations, Ken Ham, Bodie Hodge, Tim Chaffey and others have produced Demolishing Supposed Bible Contradictions, Vol. 2. This work follows what Ken Ham did in Demolishing Supposed Bible Contradictions, Vol. 1 but has utilized the help of others in answering the questions. While the word “demolishing” in the title may seem to go over board in both approach and actual delivery, the aim of the book is to provide clear, biblical and thoughtful answers to the 40 supposed Bible contradictions addressed in the book.
This is a very tragic story, one we are not likely to forget, once known. It is not about the Anthony family. It is not about the media or press. It has been exploited abundantly, but there are plenty of people out the who know exactly what I mean – it is about a little girl who is no longer in this world because someone stole her life. A heinous crime of hideous proportions. That killer walks the same streets we do every day. Is the person that stole little Caylee’s life even the slightest remorseful? Where is the justice for Caylee?
“My keys.”
Why do we suppose the “Barter” system faded away as it did? Was it do to people becoming greedy/controlling/manipulating maybe? This created what? Lack of Trust/Faith/Belief/Seperation/Division and Return? Causing a INbalance to the Natural given Balance?
"rah-rahtz" - which is Yo Gabba Gabba. I think it has something to do with "robot". Anyway, rah-rahtz is her fave.
The key issue for many state plans is implementing pension reforms, including a different governance model based on the success of Canadian and Dutch pension funds, before the funding gaps widen to the point where extremely difficult political decisions need to take place, possibly calling upon taxpayers to shore up public pension plans.
crumbs, DustBuster-hunter-gatherer.
there would be no war
Threesomes. Most women won’t go for this simply because it involves bringing another woman (or man, depending on how you get down…) into the bedroom. You probably should have talked about this one before getting married, because if the two of you aren’t literally dying of boredom, this one probably won’t happen.
We know the Israeli government will probably fold under the world's pressure, but one can still hold on to the faint hope that it won't, and Adnan can go the way of the Dodo, even if unfortunately it's quietly in a bed.
And there's always something more
The Fort Bend Sheriff could perform this task--it was his employee engaging in junk science--but the Sheriff has consistently defended Pikett's work. That's why it makes more sense to set up the review process in an office independent of the original investigation.
It is also worth mentioning that the huge economic crisis has generated splits in New Democracy. The Democratic Alliance and the Independent Greeks are both splits from the traditionally dominant right-wing party.
The road down the mountain seemed endless; we did not know how far we were from Port de Sóller. Without a map and no real idea of where we were (had we chosen the correct branch at the fork in the road?), we thought it best to pick up the pace because it was starting to get dark. Would the port be around the very next corner? No, but a man traveling up hill was, and he reassured us that we were almost there…only about 10 minutes more. Yay! Well, 10 minutes passed, then 15, and finally 20. With no sign of the port, we were really starting to worry. It would have been disappointing if we’d missed the sunset, but truly scary to be on an apparently seldom-traveled mountain road in the dark with no idea where we were or exactly where we were headed.
There is an App for that! MyHeritage has released the news that they now have an App available for free for iPad, iPhone, and Android.
You see, Mother Nature knew that this was an important day for us. She knew we would be walking here and she made sure to help us start our day off with a glorious sunrise.
By the time I got to the parking garage, I was undone. Snot was running from my nose. All of my eye makeup had dripped off of my chin. The song finished, and after I parked my car, I hit replay and listened again.
As for BLOG FORM: Hm, my posts are not so short! lol!
anywhere you go, let me go too
I haven't done yoga since Monday.
Last week I was invited to take the Queen City Underground Tour, from American Legacy Tours . This tour is full of Cincinnati beer history, and a definate must see for anyone interested in Cincinnati and or beer history. There was plenty of other information and history given on the tour, but I'll stick to the beer parts.
All that you have to do is to move your intellectual property headquarters to Ireland, and you will save HUGE . No large investment is required – a drawer at a postal service is all that is required, and this has really steamed Senator Tom Coburn (R-OK), possibly because he can’t figure out the way forward to placing his medical practice into such a situation. That said, be it for motives righteous or otherwise, he is absolutely correct.
1) Amber – she is definitely not lacking in confidence and could do a good job but doesn’t have all of the database skills.
Unlovable
Next time you are talking with someone, how about listening to their feelings and thoughts without trying to fix all their problems? Sometimes when we just listen and not place any judgment on what someone is saying, there is a deeper kind of listening happening that can create a healing vibration for who may need the help. Somewhere in your compassionate silence is a solution vibration that they will find.
I became reasonably convinced that Libra is Don DeLillo’s masterpiece about halfway through. After slogging through the first quarter of the novel — you’re introduced to dozens of characters, and they’re all revealed to you in that customarily opaque way that any reader of DeLillo will instantly recognize, and the dialogue only takes you so far because DeLillo characters don’t talk to each other so much as around each other, and it takes a while to get on solid footing, except you never really get on solid footing with DeLillo, because he forces you to slow down, he writes prose that you can’t glide over, and even when you have a handle on what’s going on, he throws in a line that comes seemingly from nowhere but feels absolutely essential to your understanding of the novel, so you have little choice but to re-read the page, and so skimming is not an option, and even after all that close reading you STILL aren’t given clear portraits of his characters, especially THESE characters, these men who live in the shadows, ruminating, plotting, conspiring, and instead you get to know them only through the sheer accretion of detail, which is all a roundabout way of saying that you have to stick with it because DeLillo assumes you’re a patient and knowledgeable reader, and everyone knows what singular event this complicated engine with all its moving parts is chugging toward — it all suddenly clicked into high gear.
Narrator: Kate Rudd
This recipe is courtesy of Around the Table: Loving Food in RI & Beyond... and can be found at this site HERE.
If you reside in a city center, get the f*ck out. NOW. If you're in the burbs, have a plan ... car always (!) fully fueled/recently serviced. With a jet pack/emergency bailout bag ready to grab/take with you in a flash (don't assume you'll be able to stand ground, when this sh*t hits. Give yourself an option). Yes, money's tight. Doesn't mean you will get away with not upgrading your front entry door, if you're in the circumference of violence. And tightening up any other possible entry points. Exchange phone numbers with your neighbors. Buy a two pack of (public airwave) mobiles. Give them one, with lithiums. Two commercial grade fire extinguishers at arms reach, minimum.
I walk out of the stall, and she hears my heels against the tile.
“We believe them to be the Sueppel family,” he said of the victims. Positive identification won’t come until the autopsies are performed.
sq km, Benue State had a
Friends and Family members and acquaintances who have gone through the fire… the torture…. the suffering at the hands of evil circumstances… sickness… disease…perils…
It’s late May and just after 6:00 in the morning. Dawn. Jeannie’s about to have her baby and Natalie is the designated driver to the hospital. Jeannie’s husband is deployed overseas which perhaps is how Nat came to be a friend. From the service.
Also, what’s going on with that dog? Gotta be a Chekhov’s gun thing, (Chekhov’s dog?) but I can’t work it out.
Im standing still
And like dialogue in spoken words, it's not transcribed reality.
The user can communicate with others using an integrated instant messaging service, which means the user can have an online chat using text & symbols to communicate with other compatible instant messaging contacts. The Samsung Galaxy Apollo I5800 also comes with an email service which supports Gmail & a push email service. Communicating using the variety of messaging service gives the user an option to communicate with friends using the best service to suit their messaging needs. A text message (SMS) is ideal when the user wishes to share a quick message with text input only, or a multimedia message (MMS) provides a perfect messaging method to share photos & video clips with other MMS compatible contacts. The Galaxy Apollo I5800 comes with call features which include a hands free speaker phone call feature, vibration call & message alert feature & a call log feature, which all make communication easy for the user of this stunning Smartphone. There is a built in FaceBook® application which means the user can quickly & easily access their FaceBook® account to change their status & to communicate with friends. All of the user contact details can be stored in the phone book, plus the user can manage their contacts with ease by editing existing contacts, deleting old contacts & by adding new contacts.
I know I am a lucky winner.
James went to town and bought Sammy some water shoes that encased his feet more than his little flip-flops and they helped... but they didn't fix the problem. He wanted to be carried from the boardwalk to a chaise lounge, where he would sit on his platform and lean over to dig in the sand with a shovel. He seemed to have a good time and was mostly happy doing that. Occasionally he would venture onto the hard-packed sand near the water but never, never onto the softer sand farther from the shore. We really tried to talk him into it, coax him along, insist that we weren't carrying him... but he was frozen with fear and screaming in terror. And then he would end up grinding the sand into the already bleeding skin from the last time and we had to scoop him up and go wash him off in fresh water... so it ended up seeming just not worth it.
With the high cost of fuel these days, people are waiting until they hear the “beep” to add gasoline. This is causing a lot of fuel pumps to fail. When you go below a quarter of a tank, the fuel pump is not completely submerged in fuel. This causes undue heat to be generated, the fuel acts as a coolant. We also recommend changing the fuel filter about every 30,000 miles to keep your pump healthy.
There are so many more
How do you grab control when a complete shut down of the system is whats on the plate? This is the question that plagues me as I write this sentence. Once upon a time there was a fat guy that had no clue what he weighed, he was unsure about his future because of the 534 pounds that hung from his bones like an over stuffed scarecrow and fear motivated him to do something about it. Two hundred twenty nine pounds later he was a bad ass weight loss success story and was in mind and body a changed person, nothing could stop him as he pushed mountains aside to gain access to his goals and that fella was me.
In evaluating the situation and asking myself what was going on in my heart, I’ve come to the conclusion that I walked in that dealership yesterday with a “you better have fixed it this time” attitude. I was preoccupied with ME, seeing myself as a victim of this car company’s neglect, and holding onto a sense of entitlement that kept me from setting my mind on Christ and thinking of the soul of this man who has been trying to help me. I was blinded by the lie that I deserve to be served, when the truth is I deserve only hell.
Feliz Navidad, paella
Essence has a new collection coming out called season of extremes Here is what Essence has to say about this collection. boredom was yesterday, spring 2012 is going to be extreme – extremely colorful! with the nail polish trend edition "season of extremes", essence unites two trendy color extremes in march 2012. bright colors are combined with subtle nude shades to create an absolutely unique color experience. whether you go for shimmer, pearl or plain, your nails can expect a true blast of color. one thing is for sure: there are no limits to your creativity. extremely individual and extremely cool! Nail polish color³ creativity to the extreme: the two-tone nail polish nail colour³ focuses on sensational color effects. the two shades can be applied individually or one on top of the other to create a unique third color. summery yellow, bright pink, nude tones or shimmer – this range has them all! your nails are sure to be the ultimate eye-catchers in town. available in three colorful combinations 01 it's two bright, 02 brightsmates and 03 we are all bright and in three soft duo-shades 04 just the nude of us, 05 team nude and 06 my best nude friends and me.
distance matters
The gospel rejects all of our attempts to earn God’s grace: offensive!
JustJenn: I need to eat something light...big dinner tonight.
Advertised as mere chocolate truffles they made my mouth do backflips. Wow! I asked her what the secret ingredient was and she said simply "peanut butter."
I popped in to my local Sainsburys today and picked up a dozen of the sixteen on the shortlist and over the next week or so i'll be blogging my opinions on each of the beers.
The film oozed onwards, and it wasn’t so bad, I suppose. But then he meets up with this girl, and it gets worse and worse and worse. Then there are the token ‘redneck assholes’ and it gets worse and worse and worse. It’s definitely not a total rip-off of any of the Matheson adaptations… nor is it original or any good at all. If ever there is such a thing as a cookie cutter post-apocalyptic zombie story starring one guy, this is it, and it sucks.
More reports show that DNA paternity testing help in legal matter also. This result of DNA Test can be product into court to prove that he is or is not the father. DNA Testing also may show any underlying problems that may be hereditary. When a mother questions the paternity of the father, she also may not know of any of these problems, which could become serious if not known.
Commissioner Martens will release the full report at 11 a.m. Friday.
Have you been? Where is your favorite place and memory?
From planning to my day-to-day experiences and to my expenses.
We ran in the cold
Google actively recruits recent Ph.D.’s and Ph.D. candidates. All 1,900 Google employees are researchers and developers in addition to their regular duties. Where other companies will keep their research departments and core businesses separate, Google places all their Ph.D.’s in the rank and file of the company. Workers at Google enjoy a company devoted to benefits (Stross, 2004). They also enjoy an informal company culture where employees have access to gyms, massages, pool and ping-pong tables, well stocked snack rooms and other recreational amenities (Google Culture, 2009). Courtesy Marty Andrade
Admitting my dislike for Kane had an unforeseen side effect in that it fired up a debate among fellow film bloggers and critics on Twitter. While I had my share of support, there were quite a few others whose judgment of my admission were blunt and, in some cases, really harsh (one blogger even re-tweeted my post with a derisive note about my “uninformed” critical opinion–at which point I thought, “Wow–I’m a critic now?? I didn’t even have to get a degree for that. Sweet!”). All things considered, though, I wasn’t really offended, because if I have learned anything in my time as a blogger, it’s that people tend to get defensive as HELL about their favorites, and you just have to roll with it.
That's my baby, Good Friday. All 307 pages of her single-spaced glory. I've been chipping away at her for the better part of the the year, but have finally hit my rhythm and expect to be within striking distance of a readable third(!) draft next month.
I think my favorite part is the egg--which was a real egg that I dyed using tea and then coated it in mod podge. There is an old bottle, an egg, an old doll head and a vintage spool.
I would rather drink water than cheap tequila or rum and I do not drink beer, wine or coffee.
The Salvation Army is an international organization that has been doing the most good in the St. Louis region for 129 years. The Salvation Army serves community members 24 hours a day, 7 days a week, 365 days a year through emergency disaster services and dozens of different programs that are designed to help people attain, or regain, self-sufficiency. For more information, please call 314.646.3000 or visit www.stl-salvationarmy.org.
Perhaps it's because I've been out of the US so long that I love this hay-covered, gun-slinging, Republican America. I might feel like an over-educated, city-slicker driving around in my Japanese-made mini SUV, but it's this alienation that makes me feel like I've gone somewhere, like I've stepped away from my normal reality and been transported into another culture or even another era.
A day, then, like this, of reparation to God’s offended majesty, would naturally suggest the necessity of joining some exterior penance to the interior dispositions of contrition which filled the hearts of Christians. Abstinence from flesh meat has always been observed on this day at Rome; and when the Roman Liturgy was established in France by Pepin and Charlemagne, the Great Litany of April 25 was, of course, celebrated, and the abstinence kept by the faithful of that country. A Council of Aix-la-Chapelle, in 836, enjoined the additional obligation of resting from servile work on this day: the same enactment is found in the Capitularia of Charles the Bald. As regards fasting, properly so called, being contrary to the spirit of Paschal Time, it would seem never to have been observed on this day, at least not generally. Amalarius, who lived in the ninth century, asserts that it was not then practiced even in Rome.
214 4. “Justice Brennan, Natural Right, and Constitutional Interpretation.” Cardozo Law Review, vol. 10, pp. 201-20 (1988). (Sources: Items D-V/2/1987 and D-III/20/1987, below.)
In America that would have made no difference. In the USA, Kriss's skin colour, the very thing his murderers killed him for, would by law have prevented his murder being treated as a race hate crime. The law deliberately denies white males protection from hate crimes.
I used to take Karate years ago, and there is a concept which is very powerful. It can be used in the spiritual world as well. You don’t fight against the power as much as you take the power tjats being used against you and turn it on your opponent. The full force of it will backfire against them. This is the meaning of the words, “pray for your enemies.” An extremely powerful dynamic takes place. Only the Lord can change the heart of man. And the cruelty which is leveled against us will return to land where it had it’s beginning in every situation.
Leaning her head against the high vinyl seatback, she avoided his smiling eyes. “More like impossible, so don’t bother trying.”
We are joined by Krista herself as our Guest Designer this week! her work is soooo beautiful don'tcha think!! gosh i love her drawings she's soooo talented!!
This blog is accordingly running a poll, to let readers express their opinion. Please use this facility: if a consensus is established it might govern not only the house style of the Journal of Intellectual Property Law & Practice but other periodicals and titles in the English language. The poll is located at the top of the jiplp weblog sidebar.
“O thou sword-storm stirrer,
The good news is that when she works on a weekend, she starts a little later and still has time to go on a short ride with Cruiser and me. I don’t lose out on all of my sister time, and Cruiser and Ranger love spending time together, too. After our short, fun ride, Ellen scurried off to work, and I saddled up to ride Cole Train.
357 11. Cynthia L. Cooper, “On file” (Interview of George Anastaplo). Student Lawyer (American Bar Association), February 2002, pp. 14-15.
And so it is no surprise that treason against nationhood is openly committed, subscribed to and championed today.
It's not like I have no one around me
Using narrow strips of painter's tape, I started to loosely sketch out the design for myself on the sweater. You really don't have to be exact here, you're just looking to create a general guide for yourself .
Here people are just fiddling around, making music, and releasing it. The mindset of being a band here is different.
You can join this party by posting your AFTER picture and then your AFTER-AFTER picture of one, or any, or all of the 21 challenges that you completed. I came up with this idea because I noticed there were a few areas that I was still tweaking after living with the new organization for a while....ok, really there were projects I was doing and wanted to SHOW OFF! Also, I knew I needed some accountability and figured I wasn't alone. So, it's been a month since the first day of the challenge, how are you doing? How is your organization holding up? What cool tweaking and projects have you done that you want to share with us? What have you learned along the way? Inquiring and organized minds want to know! (Organized Minds, what a great name for a band, or a blog, hmmmm.....)
6 And the man of God said, Where fell it? And he shewed him the place. And he cut down a stick, and cast it in thither; and the iron did swim.
Yes, I know I should have had my arm checked out sooner, but at this time my husband was going through some pretty serious health issues, himself, and it did not seem the right time to be out of commission, myself. I also kept hoping it would just get better on its own.
I am quite sure even summer is not long enough to mine the treasures wrapped up in each of my children, but I pray one day, possibly 20 years from now, they look back and realize.... she was saying "I love you". Because today as I thought about my own mother I realized, there were far more "I love you"s spoken than the ones that crossed her lips.
The good news is the weather bureau is monitoring a tropical cyclone near the Philippine Area of Responsibility. It could bring some rains if it enters the country. The bad news is just this morning, the Chinese declared that the tropical cyclone was theirs.
When I started writing, like really writing, a few years ago, I didn't know what the hell I was doing. I'm sure most of you can relate. All I had was a story that I wanted to get out using the limited knowledge I had at the time. Since deciding to pool the unlimited internet resources available to me, I've realized how very unprepared I was and how the smallest of things can really make a difference in someone's writing.
The 3 case guy is an exception and either has one hell of a social life, or is in need of some help, but I wanted to see what I had to offer.
the Elf would lay
6. Rejoice (White, Argent) 3:44
The lesson I need in this,
It would be great to have others' views on this topic.
So, where do I begin? After wasting far too much precious time changing the look of this blog I thought I'd pop back for a little update. How I wish I had a bit more technological expertise than a tadpole, I spend an inordinate amount of time sighing and having violent thoughts towards my laptop than is healthy.
Debate over the Status of Shi’ites in Egypt
Over the years, I have heard individuals where I live complaining that the board does not put issues to the community for a vote prior to taking action. They usually use the line “This is a democracy and the board should ask all homeowners to vote on the issue”. To this, I say…..”No, this is not a true democracy and the homeowners should not be asked to vote on every issue facing the community.” These individuals usually disagree with me and the conversation turns to other topics.
strongest thing she had,
As it seems for melons. Normally there are plenty of melons at the grocery stores. And now? Not one.
But we also plan on having a blast riding rides, watching shows, meeting characters
Obviously not all acts that are successful suffer this fate. Will Young is a prime example mentioned in the article. I personally don't watch these shows any more, I find it to be simply boring now, dull and repetitive. X-factor has been going for years now and after a while they all merge into one. Big Brother was suffering this very fate and at least had the decency to try and have a noble death before it became too milked. I really enjoyed the first three or so series of Big Brother. Now however I could only tell you a couple of the winners and even with that only a few more of the other contestants featured.
What? I never said I was good at blogging.
Of course, I have a HUGE sweet tooth AND I'm trying to diet. So I have no clue what I CAN eat anymore. After demonizing sugar and calories for so long, it's hard to go back to the real thing, especially while trying to lose weight. But I'm muddling my way through.
Despite recent declines in the stock market, a worker who had invested privately over the past 40 years would have still earned an average yearly return of 6.85 percent investing in the S&P 500, 3.46 percent from corporate bonds, and 2.44 percent from government bonds. If workers who retired in 2011 had been allowed to invest the employee half of the Social Security payroll tax over their working lifetime, they would retire with more income than if they relied on Social Security. Indeed, even in the worst-case scenario—a low-wage worker who invested entirely in bonds—the benefits from private investment would equal those from traditional Social Security.
The best mouse in the house! We've had the privilege of meeting Mickey Mouse several times and he's always so happy to see us. We are always happy to see Mickey too!
…or how we ate our way across Manhattan and survived the bitter, cold wind.
Look, iCarly is a cute show, with cute little stars. Yet, I feel compelled to admit, when Big Angry first read this post in drafts, his initial response was “who the Hell is iCarly?” Apparently, to Angry, it’s all us, and we don’t need to duke it out with a teeny-bopper comedy.
Day 3! In which the 5th and final clothing item is presented: this yellow skirt: Isn't it a glorious colour? And really, this picture does not do it justice - it is an acid, bright yellow. I found it on consignment for $24.99 at Regalia Boutique (shout-out!) - it's a Club Monaco stretch wool weave. I would guess by the style that it's from the 90s.
The idea for the poster of Salman Khan starrer Dabangg was allegedly inspired from Raja Hindustani’s popular song ‘Pardesi Pardesi’. Little known producer Anil Morani has sued Arbaaz for stealing his concept of goggles reflecting the inner feelings of the actors. Our sources at Bakchod Khabar say that Arbaaz Khan is contemplating an out-of-court settlement by including the popular song as an item number with Karishma Kapoor as the item girl in the upcoming sequel to Dabangg. More details are awaited.
I have sooooooooo enjoyed my journey on this team for the past 12 months
Armed with my new (and probably f*&ked up) mantra, I yanked those bad boys off the hook, and began the encasing process. To say it wasn’t pretty would be an understatement. I won’t go into all of the gory details, but let’s just say that a lot went down that day. Fabric was negotiated with. Zippers were coaxed. Tears were shed. Water breaks were taken. By the time I got to mid-thigh, I was sweating so much, I worried my perspiration would cause premature dye-transfer.
Summer was in Poverty. Trying to make ends meet was like slopping hogs from the front porch, a long throw. With her children in toll, Summer went into town shopping for fabric to make Penny and Patsy new dresses. The long-time store owner, Melvin Myrick, introduced Summer to Travis G. Dollar. She thought to herself, “Finally, a man no one is kin to.” “He is here to run my business while I’m taking care of Becky.” Melvin said. “How is your wife?” Summer asked. “The cancer is bad. I don’t think she’ll be with me much longer.” Melvin replied. “I’m so sorry, Mr. Myrick. Please give Becky my love.” Summer responded as she stared at Travis. “Thank you Summer, I will do just that. But don’t feel sorry. It’s a waste of your time. We all gotta go sometime. It’s just her season.” Melvin said. And as he turned to walk away he noticed Summer was entranced with the young man standing before her. Melvin stopped dead in his tracks and said, “Don’t you go getting’ no ideas about Travis. He’s as broke as the Ten Commandments. He can’t help you raise all them babies. Give the boy a break, he wants to live to see the sunrise.” Summer’s face took on a life of its own. First becoming inflamed with anger, then turning white as snow with full-blown embarrassment as she replied, “Mr. Myrick, I’ll inform you that I ain’t looking for no husband. So thank you very much for your unwanted advice. I would appreciate it if you would go home and be a better husband to your dying wife. Heaven knows she deserved better than the likes of you” As she spoke these words of country wisdom she realized that she had gotten Travis’ attention and she wasn’t going to let the opportunity go to waste. “Well hello.” Summer said as she took his hand. “Howdy” Travis replied. Love hatched like wild turkeys in the woods, they loved gobbled up everything in its path.
Glassless watching: this and that
This Thanksgiving we had tandoori chicken with stuffing. I used 2 cornish chicken for making this dish. It’s really easy , if you can marinate it over night that would be great . The yogurt should be thick so that the marinade holds on to the chicken, for that what I do is put it on my tea stariner and let it sit for atleast an hr. That really does the trick, it comes out really thick. Hope you all will like it.
1. 2 1/2 inch strips in fabric collections, era's, light's and dark's.
When deciding what shoes I wanted to buy, a few piqued my interest. However, I decided that I wanted a flash of colour AND I probably wouldn't wear ivory shoes very much. I didn't have a particular colour in mind when I started browsing. Once I saw the turquoise pair, I knew I wanted my accent colour to be that shade.
He'Brew Jewbelation 13
Lastly, our hope and joy is superior to anything the world can offer either through ‘new religious experiences, political change or social action. Think of it! The best that the world can offer us is like scraps from the table of God. There is nothing on earth that compares to what God has given us through Jesus Christ.
And in the end? I definitely want a chance to find another way. That's one of the reasons I love tabletop RPGs in the first place.
"For how much?" asks the man.
How do you relate to your characters? Feel free to share your own insights.
ok, i tend to be a little biased with lisa's products because i know lisa in real life,
Hey all, this is just a quick explanation post. I have been struggling a lot of late, with a lot of things, and now it's affecting the blog. I had hoped I could just carry on reviewing and posting and that maybe it could be one stable in my life right now, but to be honest, it's become another stress and not a help. I've been struggling to read much lately and finding it more stressful because I keep thinking 'I need to read so I have content' and such. And that isn't healthy, certainly not for me, not right now.
Never again……
Or if your lucky like us, your own chicory, figs, melons, cherries, tomatoes, onions, salad and a lot more.
You know how to pull me back
At our next meeting there will be ten children’s writers, poets and illustrators, all interested in talking and perhaps doing a number of different events together. Even if it turns out that we do very little together as a group, the benefits will still have been enormous. We’ve met, shared experiences, shared our books, exchanged ideas, and perhaps forged a few friendships.
I'm not sure where the time went between when I clicked 'write new post' and now, but I must trot to bed to be ready for my last workday before a nice long weekend. See you soon!
“This guy Reg Hunter,” explained Lewis Schaffer, “He’s the Number One comedian in this country.”
Bican represented Austria’s legendary Wunderteam of the 1930′s and later Czechoslovakia in what was a golden age for Central European football. He is, however, unfairly forgotten when people think the greatest forwards in history
Iron Fairy. Small, dark and very quirky restaurant which does THE best burgers in Bangkok. We went there with our good friends Tim and Elyssa and the evening past in a blur of laughter. (Remind me to tell you about the catfood story.....you gotta hear about the catfood story!)
My RE wants to see me in two weeks for an u/s. By 6 weeks in a few days, we should be able to see a heartbeat.
There’s nothing bad with this movie, but a lot of humor-impaired idiots have talked about how disappointed they are by this. Frankly, it’s hard to comprehend what the fuck is wrong with them. People with a limited sense of comedy should learn to identify what kinds of comedy they like, and stay away from everything else. If you are a pan-humorist who likes all comedy, then you’re probably not going to find anything wrong with this.
This is a textbook example of Eurocentrism and Whiteness in action--and the irony here is priceless. Pursuant to this new law, children of color and their parents in Arizona should sue to demand that funding be cut off to most public schools because from American history to English to Science and the Arts, the curriculum as presently taught devalues people of color, encourages White solidarity, is designed to reinforce Whiteness as the "normal" and "preeminent" state of being, and generates resentment on the part of those left out of America's grand narrative.
“But ethically adequate woman forgive mistakes, and — tactfully, with love and care — help to get rid of them for the future. She, in particular, will teach her beloved a way for them both to reach mutual harmony. Just a man does not have any innate understanding of the characteristics of female sexuality! This knowledge he usually gains only from the sexual experiences of other people.
tomorrow I will have a long convo with an old friend… but today I was sitting at the Marina… and I forgot where I was… it was like those mini seizures that T gets.. T and Sharika and T were kicking the soccer ball around.. I am in so much pan all I could do was watch… but they said I zoned out and was unresponsive… and when I finally responded I could not remember where we were or why we were there for a few minutes.. I have been in a fog since….. that is obviously not good…. I will follow up with a doctor tomorrow…. but while I should be happy… I just feel like crying… it is hard to control myself tonight… that alone has me concerned…. I don’t want to be doin this the way I be doin this… I am torn.. I want to write to you every day to prove how I feel about you.. but I don’t want to if all I can do is complain.. that aint right…. and right now I aint right.. and truth.. I don’t even know if you give a S or not… not sure if I will be able to sleep… Sharika needs to get out early and get to work… but I may get up later this evening and come read and write…. I got so much inside… I just need to get it out… shower just turned off.. catch up with you later.
Disturbing themes are incredibly insidious if written in inappropriate language for the scene. If one describes rape like the Swan ravaging Leda, the entire sequence becomes a tangled mess of uncertainty. Is she being raped? Or is the rape aspect cancelled out because she, herself, is not certain whether or not she agreed to it? These are the emotions Mein Herr and I are trying to build in the two main characters. Their borders between black and white become blurred due to exposure to unwanted experiences.
About halfway through I was passed by a woman named Becky who I have met in several races. She has beat me in every one. In at least three I have seen her pass me about halfway, which shows that she is far better at pacing than I am and she runs amazing negative splits. Luckily she is older than me, so we are not in the same age group. She finished about three minutes faster than me but we were both 5th in our respective AGs.
This year’s selection includes: ceramist Annabel Johnson, fine artist Jonathan Ridge, contemporary craft designer Cherry Hurren, fashion designer Kiran Gobin, textile designer Párniczky, photographer Michael Brosnan, illustrator Lindsay Grime, audio/video artist Christopher King, sculptor Belgin Bozsahin and jewellery designer Momoko Tamura.
"A very addictive TV show."
expertise required to use
10-Nero & The Gladiators - Wigwam
For my TV, I knew exactly what I wanted and how much I was willing to pay. I looked online to see if I could find any deals and I even visited my local stores. I went to Best Buy each week, because they would have new sales every Sunday, and some of these were cheaper than buying the TV online. After about 4 weeks, I found the TV I wanted with the price I would pay for it.
BAKE 20 to 25 min. or until done (160°F).
People say that to a degree, every family is dysfunctional. I personally don’t have an experience of this – my family is big and loud and we all have similar interests and are always talking and ringing each other to borrow books, movies, clothes. We go to the pub together, to the cinema, some of my siblings came to stay for New Year and we had an awesome party... So I am lucky, but I know a lot of people who are less lucky than me, and everybody has their secrets it’s just that some are bigger than others, and Bruce Bechdels’ secret was definitely one of the bigger ones.
After breakfast we went to the most opposite valley that was visited the day before. It was getting cleared up a bit after all that rain during the night. Our neighbors also went into the same valley, though they did get up earlier. Was there some kind of an agreement on the order of valley visit? We could just as well visit the valleys in a different order and not mess up each others’ wilderness experience.
I mean, I'm not surprised or anything by these kinds of reaction, but it still makes me HEADDESK all the same.
Quite a few things rattling around in the old noggin this morning here…A fresh crisp morning and the warming glow of the sun serve as an easy distraction to what we planned on talking with you about this morning. Ease on over if you like?
SMS Emden: the infamous German commerce raider from WWI
3) Serve on either a bed of creamy polenta, or slices of the ready-prepared kind from the supermarket that have been gently fried in a pan with olive oil.
The other title format we could do is to focus on the customers’ “pain avoidance” points. For example, “20 Things You Must Know Before You Call A Plumber”, “10 Warning Signs Your Hot Water Heater Could Fail In The Next 30 Days”, etc. Our customers want to avoid the pain associated with hiring the wrong plumber or ignoring the warning signs of an about to fail hot water heater.
"The real message is that there is a hazard, but that it’s much less than that of smoking, and that a widespread shift to such products could probably save a lot of lives."
3 tablespoons of soft butter
Trelinski: France is another country. Try again.
In terms of students, maybe it's a question of framing calculus as a building block rather than an end point. The mindset of students is a calculus class is to learn what they need, pass the test, and move on. Maybe teachers should play into to that a bit by framing calculus as the base for a career in engineering, for example. I'll default to Leo McGinneva's quote: "People don't want a quarter inch drill bit. They want a quarter inch hole." So the product is only a means to an end. Students don't necessarily want to learn calculus. They want a career that necessitates a knowledge of calculus.
Over the years I’ve read widely on the Famine, and crunched raw census numbers for my parishes of interest, primarily Kilseily and Killokennedy in East Clare. In my paper at Shamrock in the Bush 2009 I referred to the haemorrhaging of the people, a description which seems melodramatic but which is reaffirmed by the census data. Despite knowing the my ancestor’s townland suffered a massive 47.24% loss of population between 1841 and 1851, seeing the long-term impact on the 2002 graphs is still heart-wrenching. In 2002, Kilseily had only just (by 14 people) regained the population it had in 1926, with a very long way to go to reach earlier population numbers.
On a personal note: I was a captive reader unable to put it down, reluctant to see this story end.
I found the answer, or thought I had found the answer, or hoped with the hope that gives all sentient beings sustenance that I had found the answer when I saw this flier shoved between one of my windshield wipers while leaving the laundromat. It read as follows:
things I have often said
But I got tired of him taking my much loved sleep from me, and being in complete control of my schedule, even down to when I ate. And then I had to lead a team, which was not easy, not easy at all, especially with some strong personalities on it. (Leading people is the hardest part of any management job.) Did I do a good job? I don't think I did, to be honest.
me: Oh okay Kev you feel that because you are being upfront not to your wife but to the woman you want to sleep with, that makes it acceptable behavior. Hmmm silly me. I find your justification of adultery very amusing. You must not fear God at all. Then again I am sure with all His infinite wisdom He having been a human man once, would certainly understand your plight and give you the thumbs up on this one. I have been approached by more married men than I care to count and I tell them all the same thing…go home! Not that I have not been tempted by a few of them BUT I look at it from their wives view point and how I would feel if my husband cheated on me although if the shoe was on the other foot she may not care about me and how I feel. But you know what Kev as usual what is right is wrong and what is wrong has now been made right and who am I to judge. Have I been hurt by a man sure once but difference between me and other women is that first he and I managed to heal that hurt together and second I am not one of those women who applies bad relationship karma onto the next man. All men are not the same. Even if they think alike they don’t act a like. We all are given free will to do whatever we feel is right for us. Just remember with that free will comes responsibility and with that comes consequences. Oh and you don’t love me. Love would never do what you do.
I've been anxious pretty much throughout this pregnancy. I've most definitely been worried. Hell--I think I was past twenty weeks before I stopped looking for blood every time I went to the bathroom. I've had sleepless nights before every ultrasound. I still come to my doctor appointment with prepared lists of questions and concerns. And yet, (besides the fact that my first baby unexpectedly died for unexplained reasons) I never had a reason to worry. This pregnancy appeared to be totally textbook, and the Deuce (just like Eliza) appeared perfect at every appointment.
“Beside me there is no God formed, neither shall there be after me. I, even, am the Lord; and beside me there is no Saviour.”
Have you ever had anyone in your family ask you these questions. “Why are you always reading those books?” or ”Why are you always doing those devotionals?” I know i have in the past. Some people who just don’t understand the value of a good devotional and how it can change your heart and your focus on life.
Yup. That’s me trying to be nice. If you have a glance through my blog, you’ll see that I’m not actually a human being yet. I’m some kind of child, monkey, retard hybrid.
* I didn't puree the dressing, I just added the jalapenos, lime juice and other ingredients
a comfortable home that people love to hang-out at
Allow me to begin with a word of personal and institutional background. I was born into a Muslim family, linked by heredity to Prophet Muhammad (May peace be upon him and his family). It was fifty-four years ago that I became the 49th Imam — the spiritual leader — of the Shia Imami Ismaili Muslims, succeeding my late grandfather.
It was snowing on Rosie and I this morning. We didn't mind. My new sneakers keep my feet dry, so I am fine with the cold. I did put away all the winter coats and boots already though. oops.
various retailers, less than $2/packet
What a book!!
Once you’ve got the baklava assembled to this point, and BEFORE you place it into the oven to bake, you will need to cut it into pieces. Once the baklava is baked, it’s too delicate to cut without destroying it. Use a very sharp knife and cut the baklava into diamond-shaped pieces using the following pattern:
Never felt pretty
That’s all for today. Thanks for reading, you beautiful bastards. Take a moment to comment and follow my Twitter account @_ArmchairGooner.
Reasons to attend the Service Industries Virtual Summit:
“Yes he is but he’s with the master.”
You may receive additional entries by:
Fabulous characters, wonderful story, humorous, playful writing, MUST READ!!
spring from what they are
Which was his loss now. On some clear night
This past Friday, a whole sea of Junior High students and their parents came from all over Saitama to look at the entrance examination results. They had the students names and their status on this huge board in the front outside foyer of the school for everyone to see. It was so cute to see the little students jump in excitement when they found out they got in. A lot of students came with their friends, and many of them would jump and hug each other when they found out that they both got in together.
But how to share that plot information across multiple ships? Digital computing itself was in just the barest infancy. The idea of networking computers hadn’t even been considered. Data had to be converted from raw radar return video to a digital format suitable for display on the operator’s scope. In addition, to be shared with other ships in the task force, accurate data regarding the source ships position, course and speed had to be injected. First, since contacts were referenced by their position relative to the reporting ship, to figure the contact’s true position, the receiving ship had to know the reporting ship’s position. Secondly, if two ships were both tracking the same target, knowing that positional data allowed the computer system to filter out duplicate tracks of the same target.
As for my sister, she got drunk one New Years and made out like she’d run away. Really, she’d got a little too drunk, had a fight with friends, told us she was running away from them, then turned her phone off. It didn’t sound good, and we all worried ourselves crazy, but in the end it was nothing.
2. Liar (Ballard) 3:15
With a cast that would go nowhere afterwards and a director who would direct nothing else, Dracula (The Dirty Old Man) has absolutely nothing going for it and doesn't really do anything for anybody. Not for nudie cuties, not for vampires, not for lovers of cave interiors, and not even for fans of blood-covered female corpses. Even those with a Jewish voice fetish won't get much of a thrill outta this one.
We drove up to a darling little historical town, Kimmswick, Mo., had a delightful lunch, mile high pie (well I had chocolate turtle cheesecake :), then a quick trip into a nearby mall to take back some 'too small' (ugh) clothing. We always enjoy time with our friends!
So we could probably call without impunity. But me and Sam played guitar together… a LOT:
and while it was extremely difficult to go through, i knew in my heart of hearts it was a decision i needed to make for myself. and after voicing it, i immediately felt better. looking back, i know and trust that i am in a better state of being because of it.
We have lots of doors and latches for ease of reaching in (the latches are to confound raccoons and possums), and the "downstairs" is screened, with a ladder that raises up and down. I usually let the girls out in the backyard in the afternoons. Right now there isn't much damage they can do, but they will destroy any plantings I try to do or any planted pots. They chew the irises and lilies down to the ground, and no grass survives back there. We keep bird netting strung across half the back yard to keep them out of the vegetable garden.
One of my struggling students came up to me with her journal and so proudly said, "Can I read my story to you. I love to read and write." It makes it all worth it when they say things like that to you because you know that you have planted a seed in the child that will always be with them and be the driving force to their success.
Home Depot sells these magnet sheets that are for covering vents and, because Home Depot decided they want you to wander the store aimlessly for an hour looking for them, they stuck them in the plumbing section – a pack of 3 is around $4:
"You will leave the Summit having CREATED two pieces of content" Ohmygod. Two pieces of content! I never dreamed I could even create ONE piece of content. This is so awesome.
* When Earth scent becomes your cologne of choice
4-8 Atzjete seeds depending on the amount of oil
“Have you shown this to my cousins?” Rachel asked. “Maybe they’d have some idea who did it.”
My son then said matter of factly "Oh, that's a giant stag beetle also known as an elephant beetle.."
HEIGHT 152-155cm
By the way, Bo Chute is a French word… no, it’s a Japanese idiom made up in one of the popular quiz show in Japan called “Sekai Fushigi Hakken“. It was actually made up of one Japanese word Boshu suru(= deprive ) and a Chute in English. In this show, if the participants give a wrong answer to the question, one of their small dolls on their table, which briefly stands for their score, fall inside the chute and deprived by the host, then the host says Bo Chute! each time it happens. That’s what Menma used here to express her angry.
“Great,” I tell him, in an oddly genuine way. Greg and I, we have different approaches in doing business. That doesn’t mean we can’t be pals. Although amplified during his ten minute display of masculinity, for the most part this is actually how he carries himself, albeit in a much lighter way. I’m guessing that’s the point in having us come in today. The real lesson – the unspoken lesson – for the day is to show these recent college grads the wide array of personalities the younger sales members bring to the table. How we bring value. There’s no one way to do this. Know your role, learn the business, and figure out your persona in the process. If the trainers wanted to have some mundane presentation about the roles of a Sales Associate, all three of us wouldn’t have been asked to be present. There are only so many ways to talk about fielding scenarios, creating Excel documents, and detailing the finer points of fetching mid-morning coffees for our team members.
At its last Council meeting Elected Members passed a four-point motion that would not only see Councils relieved of the task through their rates notices, but would see State Government instigate an immediate review of the present complex funding system to address the lack of clarity about accountability and responsibility.
I hear a voice that says "Rejoice,
Cheap. Easy. Yummy.
It's PEOPLE that give food, clothing and time to shelters to help the poor.
and Mister got into "BIG trouble".
Once I read Kathy Lynn Hall's post about Indie authors seeking the authority of other indies as leaders, I wanted to give it a wider audience. Please read it and consider. Is another ruler what indies want or need after working so hard to escape the authoritarian traditional publishing regime?
Collar - 1 3/8 inch circle - trimmed
Enlightenment found For I sought her
(Dōbutsuka suru posutomodan: Otaku kara mita Nihon shakai)
